
Leon Trotsky



THE TRANSITIONAL PROGRAM


------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Death Agony of Capitalism and the Tasks of the Fourth International The Mobilization of the Masses around Transitional Demands to Prepare the Conquest of Power

(1938)

Written by Leon Trotsky in 1938. Originally published in the May-June 1938 edition of BULLETIN OF THE OPPOSITION as a discussion document for the Founding Congress of the Fourth International (World Party of Socialist Revolution). The following copy was based on the 1981 printing of the TRANSITIONAL PROGRAM by Labor Publications, and checked against the original Russian by Martin Schreader in 1999. Re-edited and proofread by Scott Wilson in 2006 for the Leon Trotsky Internet Archive. Converted to eBook format by Kollektiv Yakov Perelman, from the on-line version of THE TRANSITIONAL PROGRAM available at Trotsky Internet Archive in November 2013.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

  -   The Objective Prerequisites for a Socialist Revolution
  -   The Proletariat and its Leadership
  -   The Minimum Program and the Transitional Program
  -   Sliding Scale of Wages and Sliding Scale of Hours
  -   Trade Unions in the Transitional Epoch
  -   Factory Committees
  -   “Business Secrets” and Workers’ Control of Industry
  -   Expropriation of Separate Groups of Capitalists
  -   Expropriation of the Private Banks and State-ization of the Credit
      System
  -   The Picket Line – Defense Guards/Workers’ Militia – The Arming of
      the Proletariat
  -   The Alliance of Workers and Farmers
  -   The Struggle Against Imperialism and War
  -   Workers’ and Farmers’ Government
  -   Soviets
  -   Backward Countries and the Program of Transitional Demands
  -   The Program of Transitional Demands in Fascist Countries
  -   The USSR and Problems of the Transitional Epoch
  -   Against Opportunism and Unprincipled Revisionism
  -   Against Sectarianism
  -   Open the Road to the Woman Worker! Open the Road to the Youth!
  -   Under the Banner of the Fourth International!
  -   Appendix: A Discussion with Trotsky on the Transitional Program

------------------------------------------------------------------------


The Objective Prerequisites for a Socialist Revolution

The world political situation as a whole is chiefly characterized by a
historical crisis of the leadership of the proletariat.

The economic prerequisite for the proletarian revolution has already in
general achieved the highest point of fruition that can be reached under
capitalism. Mankind’s productive forces stagnate. Already new inventions
and improvements fail to raise the level of material wealth.
Conjunctural crises under the conditions of the social crisis of the
whole capitalist system inflict ever heavier deprivations and sufferings
upon the masses. Growing unemployment, in its turn, deepens the
financial crisis of the state and undermines the unstable monetary
systems. Democratic regimes, as well as fascist, stagger on from one
bankruptcy to another.

The bourgeoisie itself sees no way out. In countries where it has
already been forced to stake its last upon the card of fascism, it now
toboggans with closed eyes toward an economic and military catastrophe.
In the historically privileged countries, i.e., in those where the
bourgeoisie can still for a certain period permit itself the luxury of
democracy at the expense of national accumulations (Great Britain,
France, United States, etc.), all of capital’s traditional parties are
in a state of perplexity bordering on a paralysis of will.

The “New Deal,” despite its first period of pretentious resoluteness,
represents but a special form of political perplexity, possible only in
a country where the bourgeoisie succeeded in accumulating incalculable
wealth. The present crisis, far from having run its full course, has
already succeeded in showing that “New Deal” politics, like Popular
Front politics in France, opens no new exit from the economic blind
alley.

International relations present no better picture. Under the increasing
tension of capitalist disintegration, imperialist antagonisms reach an
impasse at the height of which separate clashes and bloody local
disturbances (Ethiopia, Spain, the Far East, Central Europe) must
inevitably coalesce into a conflagration of world dimensions. The
bourgeoisie, of course, is aware of the mortal danger to its domination
represented by a new war. But that class is now immeasurably less
capable of averting war than on the eve of 1914.

All talk to the effect that historical conditions have not yet “ripened”
for socialism is the product of ignorance or conscious deception. The
objective prerequisites for the proletarian revolution have not only
“ripened”; they have begun to get somewhat rotten. Without a socialist
revolution, in the next historical period at that, a catastrophe
threatens the whole culture of mankind. The turn is now to the
proletariat, i.e., chiefly to its revolutionary vanguard. The historical
crisis of mankind is reduced to the crisis of the revolutionary
leadership.


The Proletariat and its Leadership

The economy, the state, the politics of the bourgeoisie and its
international relations are completely blighted by a social crisis,
characteristic of a prerevolutionary state of society. The chief
obstacle in the path of transforming the prerevolutionary into a
revolutionary state is the opportunist character of proletarian
leadership: its petty bourgeois cowardice before the big bourgeoisie and
its perfidious connection with it even in its death agony.

In all countries the proletariat is racked by a deep disquiet. The
multimillioned masses again and again enter the road of revolution. But
each time they are blocked by their own conservative bureaucratic
machines.

The Spanish proletariat has made a series of heroic attempts since April
1931 to take power in its hands and guide the fate of society. However,
its own parties (Social Democrats, Stalinists, Anarchists, POUMists) –
each in its own way acted as a brake and thus prepared Franco’s
triumphs.

In France, the great wave of “sit down” strikes, particularly during
June 1936, revealed the wholehearted readiness of the proletariat to
overthrow the capitalist system. However, the leading organizations
(Socialists, Stalinists, Syndicalists) under the label of the Popular
Front succeeded in canalizing and damming, at least temporarily, the
revolutionary stream.

The unprecedented wave of sit down strikes and the amazingly rapid
growth of industrial unionism in the United States (the CIO) is the most
indisputable expression of the instinctive striving of the American
workers to raise themselves to the level of the tasks imposed on them by
history. But here. too, the leading political organizations, including
the newly created CIO, do everything possible to keep in check and
paralyze the revolutionary pressure of the masses.

The definite passing over of the Comintern to the side of bourgeois
order, its cynically counterrevolutionary role throughout the world,
particularly in Spain, France, the United States and other “democratic”
countries, created exceptional supplementary difficulties for the world
proletariat. Under the banner of the October Revolution, the
conciliatory politics practiced by the “People’s Front” doom the working
class to impotence and clear the road for fascism.

”People’s Fronts” on the one hand – fascism on the other: these are the
last political resources of imperialism in the struggle against the
proletarian revolution. From the historical point of view, however, both
these resources are stopgaps. The decay of capitalism continues under
the sign of the Phrygian cap in France as under the sign of the swastika
in Germany. Nothing short of the overthrow of the bourgeoisie can open a
road out.

The orientation of the masses is determined first by the objective
conditions of decaying capitalism, and second, by the treacherous
politics of the old workers’ organizations. Of these factors, the first,
of course, is the decisive one: the laws of history are stronger than
the bureaucratic apparatus. No matter how the methods of the social
betrayers differ – from the “social” legislation of Blum to the judicial
frame-ups of Stalin – they will never succeed in breaking the
revolutionary will of the proletariat. As time goes on, their desperate
efforts to hold back the wheel of history will demonstrate more clearly
to the masses that the crisis of the proletarian leadership, having
become the crisis in mankind’s culture, can be resolved only by the
Fourth International.

 


The Minimum Program and the Transitional Program

The strategic task of the next period – prerevolutionary period of
agitation, propaganda and organization – consists in overcoming the
contradiction between the maturity of the objective revolutionary
conditions and the immaturity of the proletariat and its vanguard (the
confusion and disappointment of the older generation, the inexperience
of the younger generation . It is necessary to help the masses in the
process of the daily struggle to find the bridge between present demand
and the socialist program of the revolution. This bridge should include
a system of _transitional demands_, stemming from today’s conditions and
from today’s consciousness of wide layers of the working class and
unalterably leading to one final conclusion: the conquest of power by
the proletariat.

Classical Social Democracy, functioning in an epoch of progressive
capitalism, divided its program into two parts independent of each
other: the _minimum program_ which limited itself to reforms within the
framework of bourgeois society, and the _maximum program_ which promised
substitution of socialism for capitalism in the indefinite future.
Between the minimum and the maximum program no bridge existed. And
indeed Social Democracy has no need of such a bridge, since the word
_socialism_ is used only for holiday speechifying. The Comintern has set
out to follow the path of Social Democracy in an epoch of decaying
capitalism: when, in general, there can be no discussion of systematic
social reforms and the raising of he masses’ living standards; when
every serious demand of the proletariat and even every serious demand of
the petty bourgeoisie inevitably reaches beyond the limits of capitalist
property relations and of the bourgeois state.

The strategic task of the Fourth International lies not in reforming
capitalism but in its overthrow. Its political aim is the conquest of
power by the proletariat for the purpose of expropriating the
bourgeoisie. However, the achievement of this strategic task is
unthinkable without the most considered attention to all, even small and
partial, questions of tactics. All sections of the proletariat, all its
layers, occupations and groups should be drawn into the revolutionary
movement. The present epoch is distinguished not for the fact that it
frees the revolutionary party from day-to-day work but because it
permits this work to be carried on indissolubly with the actual tasks of
the revolution.

The Fourth International does not discard the program of the old
“minimal” demands to the degree to which these have preserved at least
part of their vital forcefulness. Indefatigably, it defends the
democratic rights and social conquests of the workers. But it carries on
this day-to-day work within the framework of the correct actual, that
is, revolutionary perspective. Insofar as the old, partial, “minimal”
demands of the masses clash with the destructive and degrading
tendencies of decadent capitalism – and this occurs at each step – the
Fourth International advances a system of _transitional demands_, the
essence of which is contained in the fact that ever more openly and
decisively they will be directed against the very bases of the bourgeois
regime. The old “minimal program” is superseded by the _transitional
program_, the task of which lies in systematic mobilization of the
masses for the proletarian revolution.


Sliding Scale of Wages and Sliding Scale of Hours

Under the conditions of disintegrating capitalism, the masses continue
to live the meagerized life of the oppressed, threatened now more than
at any other time with the danger of being cast into the pit of
pauperism. They must defend their mouthful of bread, if they cannot
increase or better it. There is neither the need nor the opportunity to
enumerate here those separate, partial demands which time and again
arise on the basis of concrete circumstances – national, local, trade
union. But two basic economic afflictions, in which is summarized the
increasing absurdity of the capitalist system, that is, _unemployment_
and _high prices_, demand generalized slogans and methods of struggle.

The Fourth International declares uncompromising war on the politics of
the capitalists which, to a considerable degree, like the politics of
their agents, the reformists, aims to place the whole burden of
militarism, the crisis, the disorganization of the monetary system and
all other scourges stemming from capitalism’s death agony upon the backs
of the toilers. The Fourth International demands _employment_ and
_decent living conditions_ for all.

Neither monetary inflation nor stabilization can serve as slogans for
the proletariat because these are but two ends of the same stick.
Against a bounding rise in prices, which with the approach of war will
assume an ever more unbridled character, one can fight only under the
slogan of a _sliding scale of wages._ This means that collective
agreements should assure an automatic rise in wages in relation to the
increase in price of consumer goods.

Under the menace of its own disintegration, the proletariat cannot
permit the transformation of an increasing section of the workers into
chronically unemployed paupers, living off the slops of a crumbling
society. The _right to employment_ is the only serious right left to the
worker in a society based upon exploitation. This right today is left to
the worker in a society based upon exploitation. This right today is
being shorn from him at every step. Against unemployment, “structural”
as well as “conjunctural,” the time is ripe to advance along with the
slogan of public works, the slogan of a _sliding scale of working
hours_. Trade unions and other mass organizations should bind the
workers and the unemployed together in the solidarity of mutual
responsibility. On this basis all the work on hand would then be divided
among all existing workers in accordance with how the extent of the
working week is defined. The average wage of every worker remains the
same as it was under the old working week. Wages, under a strictly
guaranteed _minimum_, would follow the movement of prices. It is
impossible to accept any other program for the present catastrophic
period.

Property owners and their lawyers will prove the “unrealizability” of
these demands. Smaller, especially ruined capitalists, in addition will
refer to their account ledgers. The workers categorically denounce such
conclusions and references. The question is not one of a “normal”
collision between opposing material interests. The question is one of
guarding the proletariat from decay, demoralization and ruin. The
question is one of life or death of the only creative and progressive
class, and by that token of the future of mankind. If capitalism is
incapable of satisfying the demands inevitably arising from the
calamities generated by itself, then let it perish. “Realizability” or
“unrealizability” is in the given instance a question of the
relationship of forces, which can be decided only by the struggle. By
means of this struggle, no matter what immediate practical successes may
be, the workers will best come to understand the necessity of
liquidating capitalist slavery.

 


Trade Unions in the Transitional Epoch

In the struggle for partial and transitional demands, the workers now
more than ever before need mass organizations, principally trade unions.
The powerful growth of trade unionism in France and the United States is
the best refutation of the preachments of those ultra-left doctrinaires
who have been teaching that trade unions have “outlived their
usefulness.”

The Bolshevik-Leninist stands in the front-line trenches of all kinds of
struggles, even when they involve only the most modest material
interests or democratic rights of the working class. He takes active
part in mass trade unions for the purpose of strengthening them and
raising their spirit of militancy. He fights uncompromisingly against
any attempt to subordinate the unions to the bourgeois state and bind
the proletariat to “compulsory arbitration” and every other form of
police guardianship – not only fascist but also “democratic.” Only on
the basis of such work within the trade unions is successful struggle
possible against the reformists, including those of the Stalinist
bureaucracy. Sectarian attempts to build or preserve small
“revolutionary” unions, as a second edition of the party, signify in
actuality the renouncing of the struggle for leadership of the working
class. It is necessary to establish this firm rule: self-isolation of
the capitulationist variety from mass trade unions, which is tantamount
to a betrayal of the revolution, is incompatible with membership in the
Fourth International.

At the same time, the Fourth International resolutely rejects and
condemns trade union fetishism, equally characteristic of trade
unionists and syndicalists.

-   Trade unions do not offer, and in line with their task, composition
    and manner of recruiting membership, cannot offer a finished
    revolutionary program; in consequence, they cannot replace the
    _party_. The building of national revolutionary parties as sections
    of the Fourth International is the central task of the transitional
    epoch.
-   Trade unions, even the most powerful, embrace no more than 20 to 25
    percent of the working class, and at that, predominantly the more
    skilled and better paid layers. The more oppressed majority of the
    working class is drawn only episodically into the struggle, during a
    period of exceptional upsurges in the labor movement. During such
    moments it is necessary to create organizations _ad hoc_, embracing
    the whole fighting mass: strike committees, factory committees, and
    finally, soviets.
-   As organizations expressive of the top layers of the proletariat,
    trade unions, as witnessed by all past historical experience,
    including the fresh experience of the anarcho-syndicalist unions in
    Spain, developed powerful tendencies toward compromise with the
    bourgeois-democratic regime. In periods of acute class struggle, the
    leading bodies of the trade unions aim to become masters of the mass
    movement in order to render it harmless. This is already occurring
    during the period of simple strikes, especially in the case of the
    mass sit-down strikes which shake the principle of bourgeois
    property. In time of war or revolution, when the bourgeoisie is
    plunged into exceptional difficulties, trade union leaders usually
    become bourgeois ministers.

Therefore, the sections of the Fourth International should always strive
not only to renew the top leadership of the trade unions, boldly and
resolutely in critical moments advancing new militant leaders in place
of routine functionaries and careerists, but also to create in all
possible instances independent militant organizations corresponding more
closely to the tasks of mass struggle against bourgeois society; and, if
necessary, not flinching even in the face of a direct break with the
conservative apparatus of the trade unions. If it be criminal to turn
one’s back on mass organizations for the sake of fostering sectarian
factions, it is no less so passively to tolerate subordination of the
revolutionary mass movement to the control of openly reactionary or
disguised conservative (”progressive”) bureaucratic cliques. Trade
unions are not ends in themselves; they are but means along the road to
proletarian revolution.

Factory Committees

During a transitional epoch, the workers’ movement does not have a
systematic and well-balanced, but a feverish and explosive character.
Slogans as well as organizational forms should be subordinated to the
indices of the movement. On guard against routine handling of a
situation as against a plague, the leadership should respond sensitively
to the initiative of the masses.

_Sit-down strikes_, the latest expression of this kind of initiative, go
beyond the limits of “normal” capitalist procedure. Independently of the
demands of the strikers, the temporary seizure of factories deals a blow
to the idol, capitalist property. Every sit-down strike poses in a
practical manner the question of who is boss of the factory: the
capitalist or the workers?

If the sit-down strike raises this question episodically, the _factory
committee_ gives it organized expression. Elected by all the factory
employees, the factory committee immediately creates a counterweight to
the will of the administration.

To the reformist criticism of bosses of the so-called “economic
royalist” type like Ford in contradistinction to “good,” “democratic”
exploiters, we counterpose the slogan of factory committees as centers
of struggle against both the first and the second.

Trade union bureaucrats will, as a general rule, resist the creation of
factory committees, just as they resist every bold step along the road
of mobilizing the masses.

However, the wider the sweep of the movement, the easier will it be to
break this resistance. Where the closed shop has already been instituted
in “peaceful” times, the committee will formally coincide with the usual
organ of the trade union, but will renew its personnel and widen its
functions. The prime significance of the committee, however, lies in the
fact that it becomes the militant staff for such working class layers,
as the trade union is usually incapable of moving to action. It is
precisely from these more oppressed layers that the most
self-sacrificing battalions of the revolution will come.

From the moment that the committee makes its appearance, a factual dual
power is established in the factory. By its very essence it represents
the transitional state, because it includes in itself two irreconcilable
regimes: the capitalist and the proletarian. The fundamental
significance of factory committees is precisely contained in the fact
that they open the doors, if not to a direct revolutionary, then to a
pre-revolutionary period – between the bourgeois and the proletarian
regimes. That the propagation of the factory committee idea is neither
premature nor artificial is amply attested to by the waves of sit-down
strikes spreading through several countries. New waves of this type will
be inevitable in the immediate future. It is necessary to begin a
campaign in favor of factory committees in time in order not to be
caught unawares.


“Business Secrets” and Workers’ Control of Industry

Liberal capitalism, based upon competition and free trade, has
completely receded into the past. Its successor, monopolistic capitalism
not only does not mitigate the anarchy of the market, but on the
contrary imparts to it a particularly convulsive character. The
necessity of “controlling” economy, of placing state “guidance” over
industry and of “planning” is today recognized – at least in words – by
almost all current bourgeois and petty bourgeois tendencies, from
fascist to Social Democratic. With the fascists, it is manly a question
of “planned” plundering of the people for military purposes. The Social
Democrats prepare to drain the ocean of anarchy with spoonfuls of
bureaucratic “planning.” Engineers and professors write articles about
“technocracy.” In their cowardly experiments in “regulation,” democratic
governments run head-on into the invincible sabotage of big capital.

The actual relationship existing between the exploiters and the
democratic “controllers” is best characterized by the fact that the
gentlemen “reformers” stop short in pious trepidation before the
threshold of the trusts and their business “secrets.” Here the principle
of “non-interference” with business dominates. The accounts kept between
the individual capitalist and society remain the secret of the
capitalist: they are not the concern of society. The motivation offered
for the principle of business “secrets” is ostensibly, as in the epoch
of liberal capitalism, that of free competition.” In reality, the trusts
keep no secrets from one another. The business secrets of the present
epoch are part of a persistent plot of monopoly capitalism against the
interests of society. Projects for limiting the autocracy of “economic
royalists” will continue to be pathetic farces as long as private owners
of the social means of production can hide from producers and consumers
the machinations of exploitation, robbery and fraud. The abolition of
“business secrets” is the first step toward actual control of industry.

Workers no less than capitalists have the right to know the “secrets” of
the factory, of the trust, of the whole branch of industry, of the
national economy as a whole. First and foremost, banks, heavy industry
and centralized transport should be placed under an observation glass.

The immediate tasks of workers’ control should be to explain the debits
and credits of society, beginning with individual business undertakings;
to determine the actual share of the national income appropriated by
individual capitalists and by the exploiters as a whole; to expose the
behind-the-scenes deals and swindles of banks and trusts; finally, to
reveal to all members of society that unconscionable squandering of
human labor which is the result of capitalist anarchy and the naked
pursuit of profits.

No office holder of the bourgeois state is in a position to carry out
this work, no matter with how great authority one would wish to endow
him. All the world was witness to the impotence of President Roosevelt
and Premier Blum against the plottings of the “60” or “200 Families” of
their respective nations. To break the resistance of the exploiters, the
mass pressure of the proletariat is necessary. Only factory committees
can bring about real control of production, calling in – as consultants
but not as “technocrats” – specialists sincerely devoted to the people:
accountants, statisticians, engineers, scientists, etc.

The struggle against unemployment is not to be considered without the
calling for a broad and bold organization of _public works_. But public
works can have a continuous and progressive significance for society, as
for the unemployed themselves, only when they are made part of a general
plan worked out to cover a considerable number of years. Within the
framework of this plan, the workers would demand resumption, as public
utilities, of work in private businesses closed as a result of the
crisis. Workers’ control in such case: would be replaced by direct
workers’ management.

The working out of even the most elementary economic plan – from the
point of view of the exploited, not the exploiters – is impossible
without workers’ control, that is, without the penetration of the
workers’ eye into all open and concealed springs of capitalist economy.
Committees representing individual business enterprises should meet at
conference to choose corresponding committees of trusts, whole branches
of industry, economic regions and finally, of national industry as a
whole. Thus, workers’ control becomes a _school for planned economy_. On
the basis of the experience of control, the proletariat will prepare
itself for direct management of nationalized industry when the hour for
that eventuality strikes.

To those capitalists, mainly of the lower and middle strata, who of
their own accord sometimes offer to throw open their books to the
workers – usually to demonstrate the necessity of lowering wages – the
workers answer that they are not interested in the bookkeeping of
individual bankrupts or semi-bankrupts but in the account ledgers of all
exploiters as a whole. The workers cannot and do not wish to accommodate
the level of their living conditions to the exigencies of individual
capitalists, themselves victims of their own regime. The task is one of
reorganizing the whole system of production and distribution on a more
dignified and workable basis if the abolition of business secrets be a
necessary condition to workers’ control, then control is the first step
along the road to the socialist guidance of economy.


Expropriation of Separate Groups of Capitalists

The socialist program of expropriation, i.e., of political overthrow of
the bourgeoisie and liquidation of its economic domination, should in no
case during the present transitional period hinder us from advancing,
when the occasion warrants, the demand for the expropriation of several
key branches of industry vital for national existence or of the most
parasitic group of the bourgeoisie.

Thus, in answer to the pathetic jeremiads of the gentlemen democrats
anent the dictatorship of the “60 Families” of the United States or the
“200 Families” of France, we counterpose the demand for the
expropriation of those 60 or 200 feudalistic capitalist overlords.

In precisely the same way, we demand the expropriation of the
corporations holding monopolies on war industries, railroads, the most
important sources of raw materials, etc.

The difference between these demands and the muddleheaded reformist
slogan of “nationalization” lies in the following: (1) we reject
indemnification; (2) we warn the masses against demagogues of the
People’s Front who, giving lip service to nationalization, remain in
reality agents of capital; (3) we call upon the masses to rely only upon
their own revolutionary strength; (4) we link up the question of
expropriation with that of seizure of power by the workers and farmers.

The necessity of advancing the slogan of expropriation in the course of
daily _agitation_ in partial form, and not only in our propaganda in its
more comprehensive aspects, is dictated by the fact that different
branches of industry are on different levels of development, occupy a
different place in the life of society, and pass through different
stages of the class struggle. Only a general revolutionary upsurge of
the proletariat can place the complete expropriation of the bourgeoisie
on the order of the day. The task of transitional demands is to prepare
the proletariat to solve this problem.


Expropriation of the Private Banks and State-ization of the Credit System

Imperialism means the domination of _finance capital_. Side by side with
the trusts and syndicates, and very frequently rising above them, the
banks concentrate in their hands the actual command over the economy. In
their structure the banks express in a concentrated form the entire
structure of modern capital: they combine tendencies of _monopoly_ with
tendencies of _anarchy_. They organize the miracles of technology, giant
enterprises, mighty trusts; and they also organize high prices, crises
and unemployment. It is impossible to take a single serious step in the
struggle against monopolistic despotism and capitalistic anarchy – which
supplement one another in their work of destruction – if the commanding
posts of banks are left in the hands of predatory capitalists. In order
to create a unified system of investments and credits, along a rational
plan corresponding to the interests of the entire people, it is
necessary to merge all the banks into a single national institution.
Only the expropriation of the private banks and the concentration of the
entire credit system in the hands of the state will provide the latter
with the necessary actual, i.e., material resources – and not merely
paper and bureaucratic resources – for economic planning.

The expropriation of the banks in no case implies the expropriation of
bank deposits. On the contrary, the single _state bank_ will be able to
create much more favorable conditions for the small depositors than
could the private banks. In the same way, only the state bank can
establish for farmers, tradesmen and small merchants conditions of
favorable, that is, cheap credit. Even more important, however, is the
circumstance that the entire economy – first and foremost large-scale
industry and transport directed by a single financial staff, will serve
the vital interests of the workers and all other toilers.

However, the _state-ization of the banks_ will produce these favorable
results only if the state power itself passes completely from the hands
of the exploiters into the hands of the toilers.


The Picket Line, Defense Guards/Workers’ Militia and The Arming of the Proletariat

Sit-down strikes are a serious warning from the masses addressed not
only to the bourgeoisie but also to the organizations of the workers,
including the Fourth International. In 1919-20, the Italian workers
seized factories on their own initiative, thus signaling the news to
their “leaders” of the coming of the social revolution. The “leaders”
paid no heed to the signal. The victory of fascism was the result.

Sit down strikes do not yet mean the seizure of factories in the Italian
manner, but they are a decisive step toward such seizures. The present
crisis can sharpen the class struggle to an extreme point and bring
nearer the moment of denouement. But that does not mean that a
revolutionary situation comes on at one stroke. Actually, its approach
is signalized by a continuous series of convulsions. One of these is the
wave of sit-down strikes. The problem of the sections of the Fourth
International is to help the proletarian vanguard understand the general
character and tempo of our epoch and to fructify in time the struggle of
the masses with ever more resolute and organizational measures.

The sharpening of the proletariat’s struggle means the sharpening of the
methods of counterattack on the part of capital. New waves of sit down
strikes can call forth and undoubtedly will call forth resolute
countermeasures on the part of the bourgeoisie. Preparatory work is
already being done by the confidential staffs of big trusts. Woe to the
revolutionary organizations, woe to the proletariat if it is again
caught unawares!

The bourgeoisie is nowhere satisfied with the official police and army.
In the United States even during “peaceful” times the bourgeoisie
maintains militarized battalions of scabs and privately armed thugs in
factories. To this must now be added the various groups of American
Nazis. The French bourgeoisie at the first approach of danger mobilized
semi-legal and illegal fascist detachments, including such as are in the
army. No sooner does the pressure of the English workers once again
become stronger than immediately the fascist bands are doubled, trebled,
increased tenfold to come out in bloody march against the workers. The
bourgeoisie keeps itself most accurately informed about the fact that in
the present epoch the class struggle irresistibly tends to transform
itself into civil war. The examples of Italy, Germany, Austria, Spain
and other countries taught considerably more to the magnates and lackeys
of capital than to the official leaders of the proletariat.

The politicians of the Second and Third Internationals as well as the
bureaucrats of the trade unions, consciously close their eyes to the
bourgeoisie’s private army; otherwise they could not preserve their
alliance with it for even twenty-four hours. The reformists
systematically implant in the minds of the workers the notion that the
sacredness of democracy is best guaranteed when the bourgeoisie is armed
to the teeth and the workers are unarmed.

The duty of the Fourth International is to put an end to such slavish
polices once and for all. The petty bourgeois democrats – including
Social Democrats, Stalinists and Anarchists – yell louder about the
struggle against fascism the more cravenly they capitulate to it in
actuality. Only armed workers’ detachments, who feel the support of tens
of millions of toilers behind them, can successfully prevail against the
fascist bands. The struggle against fascism does not start in the
liberal editorial office but in the factory – and ends in the street.
Scabs and private gunmen in factory plants are the basic nuclei of the
fascist army. _Strike pickets_ are the basic nuclei of the proletarian
army. This is our point of departure. In connection with every strike
and street demonstration, it is imperative to propagate the necessity of
creating _workers’ groups for self-defense_. It is necessary to write
this slogan into the program of the revolutionary wing of the trade
unions. It is imperative wherever possible, beginning with the youth
groups, to organize groups for self-defense, to drill and acquaint them
with the use of arms.

A new upsurge of the mass movement should serve not only to increase the
number of these units but also to unite them according to neighborhoods,
cities, regions. It is necessary to give organized expression to the
valid hatred of the workers toward scabs and bands of gangsters and
fascists. It is necessary to advance the slogan of a _workers’ militia_
as the one serious guarantee for the inviolability of workers’
organizations, meetings and press.

Only with the help of such systematic, persistent, indefatigable,
courageous agitational and organizational work always on the basis of
the experience of the masses themselves, is it possible to root out from
their consciousness the traditions of submissiveness and passivity; to
train detachments of heroic fighters capable of setting an example to
all toilers; to inflict a series of tactical defeats upon the armed
thugs of counterrevolution; to raise the self-confidence of the
exploited and oppressed; to compromise Fascism in the eyes of the petty
bourgeoisie and pave the road for the conquest of power by the
proletariat.

Engels defined the state as “bodies of armed men.” _The arming of the
proletariat_ is an imperative concomitant element to its struggle for
liberation. When the proletariat wills it, it will find the road and the
means to arming. In this field, also, else leadership falls naturally to
the sections of the Fourth International.


The Alliance of the Workers and Farmers

The brother-in-arms and counterpart of the worker in the country is the
agricultural laborer. They are two parts of one and the same class.
Their interests are inseparable. The industrial workers’ program of
transitional demands, with changes here and there, is likewise the
program of the agricultural proletariat.

The peasants (farmers) represent another class: they are the petty
bourgeoisie of the village. The petty bourgeoisie is made up of various
layers, from the semi-proletarian to the exploiter elements. In
accordance with this, the political task of the industrial proletariat
is to carry the class struggle into the country. Only thus will he be
able to draw a dividing line between his allies and his enemies.

The peculiarities of national development of each country find their
queerest expression in the status of farmers and, to some extent, of the
urban petty bourgeoisie (artisans and shopkeepers). These classes, no
matter how numerically strong they may be, essentially are
representative survivals of pre-capitalist forms of production. The
sections of the Fourth International should work out with all possible
concreteness a program of transitional demands concerning the peasants
(farmers) and urban petty bourgeoisie, in conformity with the conditions
of each country. The advanced workers should learn to give clear and
concrete answers to the questions put by their future allies.

While the farmer remains an “independent” petty producer he is in need
of cheap credit, of agricultural machines and fertilizer at prices he
can afford to pay, favorable conditions of transport, and conscientious
organization of the market for his agricultural products. But the banks,
the trusts, the merchants rob the farmer from every side. Only the
farmers themselves with the help of the workers can curb this robbery.
_Committees elected by small farmers_ should make their appearance on
the national scene and jointly with the workers’ committees and
committees of bank employees take into their hands control of transport,
credit, and mercantile operations affecting agriculture.

By falsely citing the “excessive” demands of the workers the big
bourgeoisie skillfully transforms the question of _commodity prices_
into a wedge to be driven between the workers and farmers and between
the workers and the petty bourgeoisie of the cities. The peasant,
artisan, small merchant, unlike the industrial worker, office and civil
service employee, cannot demand a wage increase corresponding to the
increase in prices. The official struggle of the government with high
prices is only a deception of the masses. But the farmers, artisans,
merchants, in their capacity of consumers, can step into the politics of
price-fixing shoulder to shoulder with the workers. To the capitalist’s
lamentations about costs of production, of transport and trade, the
consumers answer: “Show us your books; we demand control over the fixing
of prices.” The organs of this control should be the _committees on
prices_, made up of delegates from the factories, trade unions,
cooperatives, farmers’ organizations, the “little man” of the city,
housewives, etc. By this means the workers will be able to prove to the
farmers that the real reason for high prices is not high wages but the
exorbitant profits of the capitalists and the overhead expenses of
capitalist anarchy.

The program for the _nationalization of the land and collectivization of
agriculture_ should be so drawn that from its very basis it should
exclude the possibility of expropriation of small farmers and their
compulsory collectivization. The farmer will remain owner of his plot of
land as long as he himself believes it possible or necessary. In order
to rehabilitate the program of socialism in the eyes of the farmer, it
is necessary to expose mercilessly the Stalinist methods of
collectivization, which are dictated not by the interests of the farmers
or workers but by the interests of the bureaucracy.

The expropriation of the expropriators likewise does not signify
forcible confiscation of the property of artisans and shopkeepers. On
the contrary, workers’ control of banks and trusts – even more, the
nationalization of these concerns, can create for the urban petty
bourgeoisie incomparably more favorable conditions of credit purchase,
and sale than is possible under the unchecked domination of the
monopolies. Dependence upon private capital will be replaced by
dependence upon the state, which will be the more attentive to the needs
of its small co-workers and agents the more firmly the toilers
themselves keep the state in their own hands .

The practical participation of the exploited farmers in the control of
different fields of economy will allow them to decide for themselves
whether or not it would be profitable for them to go over to collective
working of the land – at what date and on what scale. Industrial workers
should consider themselves duty-bound to show farmers every cooperation
in traveling this road: through the trade unions, factory committees,
and, above all, through a workers’ and farmers’ government.

The alliance proposed by the proletariat – not to the “middle classes in
general but to the exploited layers of the urban and rural petty
bourgeoisie, against all exploiters, including those of the “middle
classes” – can be based not on compulsion but only on free consent,
which should be consolidated in a special “contract.” This “contract” is
the program of transitional demands voluntarily accepted by both sides.


The Struggle Against Imperialism and War

The whole world outlook, and consequently also the inner political life
of individual countries, is overcast by the threat of world war. Already
the imminent catastrophe sends violent ripples of apprehension through
the very broadest masses of mankind.

The Second International repeats its infamous politics of 1914 with all
the greater assurance since today it is the Comintern which plays first
fiddle in chauvinism. As quickly as the danger of war assumed concrete
outline the Stalinists, outstripping the bourgeois and petty bourgeois
pacifists by far, became blatant haranguers for so-called “national
defense.” The revolutionary struggle against war thus rests fully on the
shoulders of the Fourth International.

The Bolshevik-Leninist policy regarding this question, formulated in the
thesis of the International Secretariat (_War and the Fourth
International_, 1934), preserves all of its force today.

In the next period a revolutionary party will depend for success
primarily on its policy on the question of war. A correct policy is
composed of two elements: an uncompromising attitude on imperialism and
its wars, and the ability to base one’s program on the experience of the
masses themselves.

The bourgeoisie and its agents use the war question, more than any
other, to deceive the people by means of abstractions, general formulas,
lame phraseology: “neutrality,” “collective defense,” “arming for the
defense of peace,” “struggle against fascism,” and so on. All such
formulas reduce themselves in the end to the fact that the war question,
i.e., the fate of the people, is left in the hands of the imperialists,
their governing staffs, their diplomacy, their generals, with all their
intrigues and plots against the people.

The Fourth International rejects with abhorrence all such abstractions
which play the same role in the democratic camp as in the fascist:
“honor “ “blood,” “race.” But abhorrence is not enough. It is imperative
to help the masses discern, by means of verifying criteria, slogans and
demands, the concrete essence of fraudulent abstractions.

”_Disarmament?_” – But the entire question revolves around who will
disarm whom. The only disarmament which can avert or end war is the
disarmament of the bourgeoisie by the workers. But to disarm the
bourgeoisie, the workers must arm themselves.

”_Neutrality?_” – But the proletariat is nothing like neutral in the war
between Japan and China, or a war between Germany and the USSR. “Then
what is meant Is the defense of China and the USSR?” Of course! But not
by the imperialists who will strangle both China and the USSR.

”_Defense of the Fatherland?_” – But by this abstraction, the
bourgeoisie understands the defense of its profits and plunder. We stand
ready to defend the fatherland from foreign capitalists, if we first
bind our own (capitalists) hand and foot and hinder them from attacking
foreign fatherlands; if the workers and the farmers of our country
become its real masters, if the wealth of the country be transferred
from the hands of a tiny minority to the hands of the people; if the
army becomes a weapon of the exploited instead of the exploiters.

It is necessary to interpret these fundamental ideas by breaking them up
into more concrete and partial ones, dependent upon the course of events
and the orientation of thought of the masses. In addition, it is
necessary to differentiate strictly between the pacifism of the
diplomat, professor, journalist, and the pacifism of the carpenter,
agricultural worker, and the charwoman. In one case, pacifism is a
screen for imperialism; in the other, it is the confused expression of
distrust in imperialism. When the small farmer or worker speaks about
the defense of the fatherland, he means defense of his home, his family
and other similar families from invasion, bombs and poison gas. The
capitalist and his journalist understand by the defense of the
fatherland the seizure of colonies and markets, the predatory increase
of the “national” share of world income. Bourgeois pacifism and
patriotism are shot through with deceit. In the pacifism and even
patriotism of the oppressed, there are elements which reflect on the one
hand a hatred of destructive war, and on the other a clinging to what
they believe to be their own good – elements which we must know how to
seize upon in order to draw the requisite conclusions.

Using these considerations as its point of departure, the Fourth
International supports every, even if insufficient, demand, if it can
draw the masses to a certain extent into active politics, awaken their
criticism and strengthen their control over the machinations of the
bourgeoisie.

From this point of view, our American section, for example, entirely
supports the proposal for establishing a referendum on the question of
declaring war. No democratic reform, it is understood, can by itself
prevent the rulers from provoking war when they wish it. It is necessary
to give frank warning of this. But not withstanding the illusions of the
masses in regard to the proposed referendum, their support of it
reflects the distrust felt by workers and farmers for bourgeois
government and Congress. Without supporting and without sparing
illusions, it is necessary to support with all possible strength the
progressive distrust of the exploited toward the exploiters. The more
widespread the movement for the referendum becomes, the sooner will the
bourgeois pacifists move away from it; the more completely will the
betrayers of the Comintern be compromised; the more acute will distrust
of the imperialists become.

From this viewpoint, it is necessary to advance the demand: electoral
rights for men and women beginning with age of 18. Those who will be
called upon to die for the fatherland tomorrow should have the right to
vote today. The struggle against war must first of all begin with the
_revolutionary mobilization of the youth_.

Light must be shed upon the problem of war from all angles, hinging upon
the side from which it will confront the masses at a given moment.

War is a gigantic commercial enterprise, especially for the war
industry. The “60 Families” are therefore first-line patriots and the
chief provocateurs of war. _Workers’ control of war industries_ is the
first step in the struggle against the “manufacturers” of war.

To the slogan of the reformists: _a tax on military profit_, we
counterpose the slogans: _confiscation of military profit_ and
_expropriation of the traffickers in war industries_. Where military
industry is “nationalized,” as in France, the slogan of _workers’
control_ preserves its full strength. The proletariat has as little
confidence in the government of the bourgeoisie as in an individual
capitalist

Not one man and not one penny for the bourgeois government!

Not an armaments program but a program of useful public works!

Complete independence of workers’ organizations from military-police
control!

Once and for all we must tear from the hands of the greedy and merciless
imperialist clique, scheming behind the backs of the people, the
disposition of the people’s fate. In accordance with this, we demand:

-   Complete abolition of secret diplomacy;
-   All treaties and agreements to be made accessible to all workers and
    farmers;
-   Military training and arming of workers and farmers under direct
    control of workers’ and farmers’ committees;
-   Creation of military schools for the training of commanders among
    the toilers, chosen by workers’ organizations;
-   Substitution for the standing army of a _people’s militia_,
    indissolubly linked up with factories, mines, farms, etc.

Imperialist war is the continuation and sharpening of the predatory
politics of the bourgeoisie. The struggle of the proletariat against war
is the continuation and sharpening of its class struggle. The beginning
of war alters the situation and partially the means of struggle between
the classes, but not the aim and basic course. The imperialist
bourgeoisie dominates the world. In its basic character the approaching
war will therefore be an imperialist war. The fundamental content of the
politics of the international proletariat will consequently be a
struggle against imperialism and its war. In this struggle the basic
principle is: “the chief enemy is in _your own_ country” or “the defeat
of _your own_ (imperialist) government is the lesser evil.”

But not all countries of the world are imperialist countries. On the
contrary, the majority are victims of imperialism. Some of the colonial
or semi colonial countries will undoubtedly attempt to utilize the war
in order to east off the yoke of slavery. Their war will be not
imperialist but liberating. It will be the duty of the international
proletariat to aid the oppressed countries in their war against
oppressors. The same duty applies in regard to aiding the USSR, or
whatever other workers’ government might arise before the war or during
the war. The defeat of _every_ imperialist government in the struggle
with the workers’ state or with a colonial country is the lesser evil.

The workers of imperialist countries, however, cannot help an
anti-imperialist country through their own government, no matter what
might be the diplomatic and military relations between the two countries
at a given moment. If the governments find themselves in a temporary
and, by the very essence of the matter, unreliable alliance, then the
proletariat of the imperialist country continues to remain in class
opposition to its own government and supports the non-imperialist “ally”
through its _own_ methods, i.e., through the methods of the
international class struggle (agitation not only against their
perfidious allies, but also in favor of a workers’ state in a colonial
country; boycott, strikes, in one case; rejection of boycott and strikes
in another case, etc.)

In supporting the colonial country or the USSR in a war, the proletariat
does not in the slightest degree solidarize either with the bourgeois
government of the colonial country or with the Thermidorian bureaucracy
of the USSR. On the contrary, it maintains full political independence
from the one as from the other. Giving aid in a just and progressive
war, the revolutionary proletariat wins the sympathy of the workers in
the colonies and in the USSR, strengthens there the authority and
influence of the Fourth International, and increases its ability to help
overthrow the bourgeois government in the colonial country, the
reactionary bureaucracy in the USSR.

At the beginning of the war the sections of the Fourth International
will inevitably feel themselves isolated: every war takes the national
masses unawares and impels them to the side of the government apparatus.
The internationalists will have to swim against the stream. However, the
devastation and misery brought about by the new war, which in the first
months will far outstrip the bloody horrors of 1914-18 will quickly
prove sobering. The discontents of the masses and their revolt will grow
by leaps and bounds. The sections of the Fourth International will be
found at the head of the revolutionary tide. The program of transitional
demands will gain burning actuality. The problem of the conquest of
power by the proletariat will loom in full stature.

Before exhausting or drowning mankind in blood, capitalism befouls the
world atmosphere with the poisonous vapors of national and race hatred.
_Anti-Semitism_ today is one of the most malignant convulsions of
capitalism’ s death agony.

An uncompromising disclosure of the roots of race prejudice and all
forms and shades of national arrogance and chauvinism, particularly
anti-Semitism, should become part of the daily work of all sections of
the Fourth International, as the most important part of the struggle
against imperialism and war. Our basic slogan remains: Workers of the
World Unite!


Workers’ and Farmers’ Government

This formula, “workers’ and farmers’ government,” first appeared in the
agitation of the Bolsheviks in 1917 and was definitely accepted after
the October Revolution. In the final instance it represented nothing
more than the popular designation for the already established
dictatorship of the proletariat. The significance of this designation
comes mainly from the that it underscored the idea of an _alliance
between the proletariat and the peasantry_ upon which the Soviet power
rests.

When the Comintern of the epigones tried to revive the formula buried by
history of the “democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and
peasantry,” it gave to the formula of the “workers’ and peasants’
government” a completely different, purely “democratic,” i.e., bourgeois
content, _counterposing_ it to the dictatorship of the proletariat. The
Bolshevik-Leninists resolutely rejected the slogan of the “workers’ and
peasants’ government” in the bourgeois-democratic version. They affirmed
then and affirm now that. when the party of the proletariat refuses to
step beyond bourgeois democratic limits, its alliance with the peasantry
is simply turned into a support for capital, as was the ease with the
Mensheviks and the Social Revolutionaries in 1917, with the Chinese
Communist Party in 1925-27, and as is now the ease with the “People’s
Front” in Spain, France and other countries.

From April to September 1917, the Bolsheviks demanded that the SRs and
Mensheviks break with the liberal bourgeoisie and take power into their
own hands. Under this provision the Bolshevik Party promised the
Mensheviks and the SRs, as the petty bourgeois representatives of the
worker and peasants, its revolutionary aid against the bourgeoisie
categorically refusing, however, either to enter into the government of
the Mensheviks and SRs or to carry political responsibility for it. If
the Mensheviks and SRs had actually broke with the Cadets (liberals) and
with foreign imperialism, then the “workers’ and peasants’ government”
created by them could only have hastened and facilitated the
establishment of the dictatorship of the proletariat. But it was exactly
because of this that the leadership of petty bourgeois democracy
resisted with all possible strength the establishment of its own
government. The experience of Russia demonstrated, and the experience of
Spain and France once again confirms, that even under very favorable
conditions the parties of petty bourgeois democracy (SRs, Social
Democrats, Stalinists, Anarchists) are incapable of creating a
government of workers and peasants, that is, a government independent of
the bourgeoisie.

Nevertheless, the demand of the Bolsheviks, addressed to the Mensheviks
and the SRs: “Break with the bourgeoisie, take the power into your own
hands!” had for the masses tremendous educational significance. The
obstinate unwillingness of the Mensheviks and SRs to take power, so
dramatically exposed during the July Days, definitely doomed them before
mass opinion and prepared the victory of the Bolsheviks.

The central task of the Fourth International consists in freeing the
proletariat from the old leadership, whose conservatism is in complete
contradiction to the catastrophic eruptions of disintegrating capitalism
and represents the chief obstacle to historical progress. The chief
accusation which the Fourth International advances against the
traditional organizations of the proletariat is the fact that they do
not wish to tear themselves away from the political semi-corpse of the
bourgeoisie. Under these conditions the demand, systematically addressed
to the old leadership: “Break with the bourgeoisie, take the power!” is
an extremely important weapon for exposing the treacherous character of
the parties and organizations of the Second, Third and Amsterdam
Internationals. The slogan, “workers’ and farmers’ government,” is thus
acceptable to us only in the sense that it had in 1917 with the
Bolsheviks, i.e., as an anti-bourgeois and anti-capitalist slogan. but
in no case in that “democratic” sense which later the epigones gave it,
transforming it from a bridge to Socialist revolution into the chief
barrier upon its path.

Of all parties and organizations which base themselves on the workers
and peasants and speak in their name, we demand that they break
politically from the bourgeoisie and enter upon the road of struggle for
the workers’ and farmers’ government. On this road we promise them full
support against capitalist reaction. At the same time, we indefatigably
develop agitation around those transitional demands which should in our
opinion form the program of the “workers’ and farmers’ government.”

Is the creation of such a government by the traditional workers’
organizations possible? Past experience shows, as has already been
stated, that this is, to say the least, highly improbable. However, one
cannot categorically deny in advance the theoretical possibility that,
under the influence of completely exceptional circumstances (war,
defeat, financial crash, mass revolutionary pressure, etc.), the petty
bourgeois parties, including the Stalinists, may go further than they
wish along the road to a break with the bourgeoisie. In any case one
thing is not to be doubted: even if this highly improbable variant
somewhere at some time becomes a reality and the “workers’ and farmers’
government” in the above-mentioned sense is established in fact, it
would represent merely a short episode on the road to the actual
dictatorship of the proletariat.

However, there is no need to indulge in guesswork. The agitation around
the slogan of a workers’-farmers’ government preserves under all
conditions a tremendous educational value. And not accidentally. This
generalized slogan proceeds entirely along the line of the political
development of our epoch (the bankruptcy and decomposition of the old
bourgeois parties, the downfall of democracy, the growth of fascism, the
accelerated drive of the workers toward more active and aggressive
politics). Each of the transitional demands should, therefore, lead to
one and the same political conclusion: the workers need to break with
all traditional parties of the bourgeoisie in order, jointly with the
farmers, to establish their own power.

It is impossible in advance to foresee what will be the concrete stages
of the revolutionary mobilization of the masses. The sections of the
Fourth International should critically orient themselves at each new
stage and advance such slogans as will aid the striving of the workers
for independent politics, deepen the class struggle of these politics,
destroy reformist and pacifist illusions, strengthen the connection of
the vanguard with the masses, and prepare the revolutionary conquest of
power.


Soviets

_Factory committees_, as already stated, are elements of dual power
inside the factory. Consequently, their existence is possible only under
conditions of increasing pressure by the masses. This is likewise true
of special mass groupings for the struggle _against war_, of the
_committees on prices_, and all other new centers of the movement, the
very appearance of which bears witness to the fact that the class
struggle has overflowed the limits of the traditional organizations of
the proletariat.

These new organs and centers, however, will soon begin to feel their
lack of cohesion and their insufficiency. Not one of the transitional
demands can be fully met under the conditions of preserving the
bourgeois regime. At the same time, the deepening of the social crisis
will increase not only the sufferings of the masses but also their
impatience, persistence and pressure. Ever new layers of the oppressed
will raise their heads and come forward with their demands. Millions of
toil-worn “little men,” to whom the reformist leaders never gave a
thought, will begin to pound insistently on the doors of the workers’
organizations. The unemployed will join the movement. The agricultural
workers, the ruined and semi-ruined farmers, the oppressed of the
cities, the women workers, housewives, proletarianized layers of the
intelligentsia – all of these will seek unity and leadership.

How are the different demands and forms of struggle to be harmonized,
even if only within the limits of one city? History has already answered
this question: through _soviets_. These will unite the representatives
of all the fighting groups. For this purpose, no one has yet proposed a
different form of organization; indeed, it would hardly be possible to
think up a better one. Soviets are not limited to an _a priori_ party
program. They throw open their doors to all the exploited. Through these
doors pass representatives of all strata, drawn into the general current
of the struggle. The organization, broadening out together with the
movement, is renewed again and again in its womb. All political currents
of the proletariat can struggle for leadership of the soviets on the
basis of the widest democracy. The slogan of _soviets_, therefore,
crowns the program of transitional demands.

Soviets can arise only at the time when the mass movement enters into an
openly revolutionary stage. From the first moment of their appearance,
the soviets, acting as a pivot around which millions of toilers are
united in their struggle against the exploiters, become competitors and
opponents of local authorities and then of the central government. If
the factory committee creates a dual power in the factory, then the
soviets initiate a period of dual power in the country.

Dual power in its turn is the culminating point of the transitional
period. Two regimes, the bourgeois and the proletarian, are
irreconcilably opposed to each other. Conflict between them is
inevitable. The fate of society depends on the outcome. Should the
revolution be defeated, the fascist dictatorship of the bourgeoisie will
follow. In the case of victory, the power of the soviets, that is, the
dictatorship of the proletariat and the socialist reconstruction of
society, will arise.


Backward Countries and the Program of Transitional Demands

Colonial and semi-colonial countries are backward countries by their
very essence. But backward countries are part of a world dominated by
imperialism. Their development, therefore, has a _combined_ character:
the most primitive economic forms are combined with the last word in
capitalist technique and culture. In like manner are defined the
political strivings of the proletariat of backward countries: the
struggle for the most elementary achievements of national independence
and bourgeois democracy is combined with the socialist struggle against
world imperialism. Democratic slogans, transitional demands and the
problems of the socialist revolution are not divided into separate
historical epochs in this struggle, but stem directly from one another.
The Chinese proletariat had barely begun to organize trade unions before
it had to provide for soviets. In this sense, the present program is
completely applicable to colonial and semi-colonial countries, at least
to those where the proletariat has become capable of carrying on
independent politics.

The central task of the colonial and semi-colonial countries is the
_agrarian revolution_, i.e., liquidation of feudal heritages, and
_national independence_, i.e., the overthrow of the imperialist yoke.
Both tasks are closely linked with each other.

It is impossible merely to reject the democratic program; it is
imperative that in the struggle the masses outgrow it. The slogan for a
National (or Constituent) Assembly preserves its full force for such
countries as China or India. This slogan must be indissolubly tied up
with the problem of national liberation and agrarian reform. As a
primary step, the workers must be armed with this democratic program.
Only they will be able to summon and unite the farmers. On the basis of
the revolutionary democratic program, it is necessary to oppose the
workers to the “national” bourgeoisie. Then, at a certain stage in the
mobilization of the masses under the slogans of revolutionary democracy,
soviets can and should arise. Their historical role in each given
period, particularly their relation to the National Assembly, will be
determined by the political level of the proletariat, the bond between
them and the peasantry, and the character of the proletarian party
policies. Sooner or later, the soviets should overthrow bourgeois
democracy. Only they are capable of bringing the democratic revolution
to a conclusion and likewise opening an era of socialist revolution.

The relative weight of the individual democratic and transitional
demands in the proletariat’s struggle, their mutual ties and their order
of presentation, is determined by the peculiarities and specific
conditions of each backward country and to a considerable extent by the
_degree_ of its backwardness. Nevertheless, the general trend of
revolutionary development in all backward countries can be determined by
the formula of the permanent revolution in the sense definitely imparted
to it by the three revolutions in Russia (1905, February 1917, October
1917).

The Comintern has provided backward countries with a classic example of
how it is possible to ruin a powerful and promising revolution. During
the stormy mass upsurge in China in 1925-27, the Comintern failed to
advance the slogan for a National Assembly, and at the same time forbade
the creation of soviets. (The bourgeois party, the Kuomintang, was to
replace, according to Stalin’s plan, both the National Assembly and
soviets.) After the masses had been smashed by the Kuomintang, the
Comintern organized a caricature of a soviet in Canton. Following the
inevitable collapse of the Canton uprising, the Comintern took the road
of guerrilla warfare a peasant soviets with complete passivity on the
part of the industrial proletariat. Landing thus in a blind alley, the
Comintern took advantage of the Sino-Japanese War to liquidate “Soviet
China” with a stroke of the pen, subordinating not only the peasant “Red
Army” but also the so-called “Communist” Party to the identical
Kuomintang, i.e., the bourgeoisie.

Having betrayed the international proletarian revolution for the sake of
friendship with the “democratic” slavemasters, the Comintern could not
help betraying simultaneously also the struggle for liberation of the
colonial masses, and, indeed, with even greater cynicism than did the
Second International before it. One of the tasks of People’s Front and
“national defense” politics is to turn hundreds of millions of the
colonial population into cannon fodder for “democratic” imperialism. The
banner on which is emblazoned the struggle for the liberation of the
colonial and semi-colonial peoples, i.e., a good half of mankind, has
definitely passed into the hands of the Fourth International.


The Program of Transitional Demands in Fascist Countries

It is a far cry today from the time when the strategists of the
Comintern announced the victory of Hitler as being merely a step toward
the victory of Thaelmann. Thaelmann has been in Hitler’s prisons now for
more than five years. Mussolini has held Italy enchained by fascism for
more than sixteen years. Throughout this time, the parties of the Second
and Third Internationals have been impotent, not only to conduct a mass
movement, but even to create a serious illegal organization, even to
some extent comparable to the Russian revolutionary parties during the
epoch of Tsarism.

Not the least reason exists for explaining these failures by reference
to the power of fascist ideology. (Essentially, Mussolini never advanced
any sort of ideology.) Hitler’s “ideology” never seriously gripped the
workers. Those layers of the population which at one time were
intoxicated with fascism i.e., chiefly the middle classes, have had
enough time in which to sober up. The fact that a somewhat perceptible
opposition is limited to Protestant and Catholic church circles is not
explained by the might of the semi-delirious and semi-charlatan theories
of “race” and “blood,” but by the terrific collapse of the ideologies of
democracy, Social Democracy and the Comintern.

After the massacre of the Paris Commune, black reaction reigned for
nearly eight years. After the defeat of the 1905 Russian revolution, the
toiling masses remained in a stupor for almost as long a period. But in
both instances the phenomenon was only one of physical defeat,
conditioned by the relationship of forces. In Russia, in addition, it
concerned an almost virgin proletariat. The Bolshevik faction had at
that time not celebrated even its third birthday. It is completely
otherwise in Germany where the leadership came from powerful parties one
of which had existed for seventy years, the other almost fifteen. Both
these parties, with millions of voters behind them, were morally
paralyzed before the battle and capitulated without a battle. History
has recorded no parallel catastrophe. The German proletariat was not
smashed by the enemy in battle. It was crushed by the cowardice,
baseness, perfidy of its own parties. Small wonder then that it has lost
faith in everything in which it had been accustomed to believe for
almost three generations. Hitler’s victory in turn strengthened
Mussolini.

The protracted failure of revolutionary work in Spain or Germany is but
the reward for the criminal politics of the Social Democracy and the
Comintern. Illegal work needs not only the sympathy of the masses but
the conscious enthusiasm of its advanced strata. But can enthusiasm
possibly be expected for historically bankrupt organizations? The
majority of those who come forth as emigre leaders are either
demoralized to the very marrow of their bones, agents of the Kremlin and
the GPU, or Social Democratic ex-ministers, who dream that the workers
by some sort of miracle will return them to their lost posts. Is it
possible to imagine even for a minute these gentlemen in the role of
future leaders of the “anti-fascist” revolution?

And events on the world arena – the smashing of the Austrian workers,
the defeat of the Spanish Revolution, the degeneration of the Soviet
state – could not give aid to a revolutionary upsurge in Italy and
Germany. Since for political information the German and Italian workers
depend in great measure upon the radio, it is possible to say with
assurance that the Moscow radio station, combining Thermidorian lies
with stupidity and insolence, has become the most powerful factor in the
demoralization of the workers in the totalitarian states. In this
respect as in others, Stalin acts merely as Goebbels’ assistant.

At the same time, the class antagonisms which brought about the victory
of fascism, continuing their work under fascism too, are gradually
undermining it. The masses are more dissatisfied than ever. Hundreds and
thousands of self-sacrificing workers, in spite of everything, continue
to carry on revolutionary mole-work. A new generation, which has nor
directly experienced the shattering of old traditions and high hopes,
has come to the fore. Irresistibly, the molecular preparation of the
proletarian revolution proceeds beneath the heavy totalitarian
tombstone. But, for concealed energy to flare into open revolt, it is
necessary that the vanguard of the proletariat find new perspectives, a
new program and a new unblemished banner.

Herein lies the chief handicap. It is extremely difficult for workers in
fascist countries to make a choice of a new program. A program is
verified by experience. And it is precisely experience in mass movements
which is lacking in countries of totalitarian despotism. It is very
likely that a genuine proletarian success in one of the “democratic”
countries will be necessary to give impetus to the revolutionary
movement on fascist territory. A similar effect is possible by means of
a financial or military catastrophe. At present, it is imperative that
primarily propagandistic, preparatory work be carried on which will
yield large-scale results only in the future. One thing can be stated
with conviction even at this point: once it breaks through, the
revolutionary wave in fascist countries will immediately be a grandiose
sweep and under no circumstances will stop short at the experiment of
resuscitating some sort of Weimar corpse.

It is from this point onward that an uncompromising divergence begins
between the Fourth International and the old parties, which outlive
their bankruptcy. The emigre “People’s Front” is the most malignant and
perfidious variety of all possible People’s Fronts. Essentially, it
signifies the impotent longing for coalition with a nonexistent liberal
bourgeoisie. Had it met with success, it would simply have prepared a
series of new defeats of the Spanish type for the proletariat. A
merciless exposure of the theory and practice of the “People’s Front” is
therefore the first condition for a revolutionary struggle against
fascism.

Of course, this does not mean that the Fourth International rejects
democratic slogans as a means of mobilizing the masses against fascism.
On the contrary, such slogans at certain moments can play a serious
role. But the formulae of democracy (freedom of press, the right to
unionize, etc.) mean for us only incidental or episodic slogans in the
independent movement of the proletariat and not a democratic noose
fastened to the neck of the proletariat by the bourgeoisie’s agents
(Spain!). As soon as the movement assumes something of a mass character,
the democratic slogans will be intertwined with the transitional ones;
factory committees, it may be supposed, will appear before the old
routinists rush from their chancelleries to organize trade unions;
soviets will cover Germany before a new Constituent Assembly will gather
in Weimar. The same applies to Italy and the rest of the totalitarian
and semi-totalitarian countries.

Fascism plunged these countries into political barbarism. But it did not
change their social structure. Fascism is a tool in the hands of finance
capital and not of feudal landowners. A revolutionary program should
base itself on the dialectics of the class struggle, obligatory also to
fascist countries, and not on the psychology of terrified bankrupts. The
Fourth International rejects with disgust the ways of political
masquerade which impelled the Stalinists, the former heroes of the
“Third Period,” to appear in turn behind the masks of Catholics,
Protestants, Jews, German nationalists, liberals – only in order to hide
their own unattractive face. The Fourth International always and
everywhere appears under its own banner. It proposes its own program
openly to the proletariat in fascist countries. The advanced workers of
all the world are already firmly convinced that the overthrow of
Mussolini, Hitler and their agents and imitators will occur only under
the leadership of the Fourth International.


The USSR and Problems of the Transitional Epoch

The Soviet Union emerged from the October Revolution as a workers’
state. State ownership of the means of production, a necessary
prerequisite to socialist development, opened up the possibility of
rapid growth of the productive forces. But the apparatus of the workers’
state underwent a complete degeneration at the same time: it was
transformed from a weapon of the working class into a weapon of
bureaucratic violence against the working class and more and more a
weapon for the sabotage of the country’s economy. The bureaucratization
of a backward and isolated workers’ state and the transformation of the
bureaucracy into an all-powerful privileged caste constitute the most
convincing refutation – not only theoretically, but this time,
practically – of the theory of socialism in one country.

The USSR thus embodies terrific contradictions. But it still remains a
_degenerated workers’ state_. Such is the social diagnosis. The
political prognosis has an alternative character: either the
bureaucracy, becoming ever more the organ of the world bourgeoisie in
the workers’ state, will overthrow the new forms of property and plunge
the country back to capitalism; or the working class will crush the
bureaucracy and open the way to socialism.

To the sections of the Fourth International, the Moscow Trials came not
as a surprise and not as a result of the personal madness of the Kremlin
dictator, but as the legitimate offspring of the Thermidor. They grew
out of the unbearable conflicts within the Soviet bureaucracy itself,
which in turn mirror the contradictions between the bureaucracy and the
people, as well as the deepening antagonisms among the “people”
themselves. The bloody “fantastic” nature of the trials gives the
measure of the intensity of the contradictions and by the same token
predicts the approach of the denouement.

The public utterances of former foreign representatives of the Kremlin,
who refused to return to Moscow, irrefutably confirm in their own way
that all shades of political thought are to be found among the
bureaucracy: from genuine Bolshevism (Ignace Reiss) to complete fascism
(F. Butenko). The revolutionary elements within the bureaucracy, only a
small minority, reflect, passively it is true, the socialist interests
of the proletariat. The fascist, counterrevolutionary elements, growing
uninterruptedly, express with even greater consistency the interests of
world imperialism. These candidates for the role of compradors consider,
not without reason, that the new ruling layer can insure their positions
of privilege only through rejection of nationalization, collectivization
and monopoly of foreign trade in the name of the assimilation of
“Western civilization.’’ i.e., capitalism. Between these two poles,
there are intermediate, diffused Menshevik-SR-liberal tendencies which
gravitate toward bourgeois democracy.

Within the very ranks of that so-called “classless” society, there
unquestionably exist groupings exactly similar to those in the
bureaucracy, only less sharply expressed and in inverse proportions:
conscious capitalist tendencies distinguish mainly the prosperous part
of the collective farms _(kolkhozi)_ and are characteristic of only a
small minority of the population. But this layer provides itself with a
wide base for petty bourgeois tendencies of accumulating personal wealth
at the expense of general poverty, and are consciously encouraged by the
bureaucracy.

Atop this system of mounting antagonisms, trespassing ever more on the
social equilibrium, the Thermidorian oligarchy, today reduced mainly to
Stalin’s Bonapartist clique, hangs on by terroristic methods. The latest
judicial frame-ups were aimed as a blow _against the left_. This is true
also of the mopping up of the leaders of the Right Opposition, because
the Right group of the old Bolshevik Party, seen from the view point of
the bureaucracy’s interests and tendencies, represented a _left_ danger.
The fact that the Bonapartist clique, likewise in fear of its own right
allies of the type of Butenko, is forced in the interests of
self-preservation to execute the generation of Old Bolsheviks almost to
a man, offers indisputable testimony of the vitality of revolutionary
traditions among the masses as well as of their growing discontent.

Petty bourgeois democrats of the West, having but yesterday assayed the
Moscow Trials as unalloyed gold, today repeat insistently that there is
“neither Trotskyism nor Trotskyists within the USSR.” They fail to
explain, however, why all the purges are conducted under the banner of a
struggle with precisely this danger. If we are to examine “Trotskyism”
as a finished program, and, even more to the point, as an organization,
then unquestionably “Trotskyism” is extremely weak in the USSR. However,
its indestructible force stems from the fact that it expresses not only
revolutionary tradition, but also today’s actual opposition of the
Russian working class. The social hatred stored up by the workers
against the bureaucracy – this is precisely what from the viewpoint of
the Kremlin clique constitutes “Trotskyism.” It fears with a deathly and
thoroughly well-grounded fear the bond between the deep but inarticulate
indignation of the workers and the organization of the Fourth
International.

The extermination of the generation of Old Bolsheviks and of the
revolutionary representatives of the middle and young generations has
acted to disrupt the political equilibrium still more in favor of the
right, bourgeois wing of the bureaucracy and of its allies throughout
the land. From them, i.e., from the right, we can expect ever more
determined attempts in the next period to revise the socialist character
of the USSR and bring it closer in pattern to “Western civilization” in
its fascist form.

From this perspective, impelling concreteness is imparted to the
question of the “defense of the USSR.” If tomorrow the bourgeois-fascist
grouping, the “faction of Butenko,” so to speak, should attempt the
conquest of power, the “faction of Reiss” inevitably would align itself
on the opposite side of the barricades. Although it would find itself
temporarily the ally of Stalin, it would nevertheless defend not the
Bonapartist clique but the social base of the USSR, i.e., the property
wrenched away from the capitalists and transformed into state property.
Should the “faction of Butenko” prove to be in alliance with Hitler,
then the “faction of Reiss” would defend the USSR from military
intervention, inside the country as well as on the world arena. Any
other course would be a betrayal.

Although it is thus impermissible to deny in advance the possibility, in
strictly defined instances, of a “united front” with the Thermidorian
section of the bureaucracy against open attack by capitalist
counterrevolution, the chief political task in the USSR still remains
the _overthrow of this same Therrnidorian bureaucracy_. Each day added
to its domination helps rot the foundations of the socialist elements of
economy and increases the chances for capitalist restoration. It is in
precisely this direction that the Comintern moves as the agent and
accomplice of the Stalinist clique in strangling the Spanish Revolution
and demoralizing the international proletariat.

As in fascist countries, the chief strength of the bureaucracy lies not
in itself but in the disillusionment of the masses, in their lack of a
new perspective. As in fascist countries, from which Stalin’s
_political_ apparatus does not differ, save in more unbridled savagery,
only preparatory propagandistic work is possible today in the USSR. As
in fascist countries, the impetus to the Soviet workers’ revolutionary
upsurge will probably be given by events outside the country. The
struggle against the Comintern on the world arena is the most important
part today of the struggle against the Stalinist dictatorship. There are
many signs that the Comintern’s downfall, because it does not have a
_direct_ base in the GPU, will precede the downfall of the Bonapartist
clique and the Thermidorian bureaucracy as a whole.

A fresh upsurge of the revolution in the USSR will undoubtedly begin
under the banner of the struggle against _social inequality and
political oppression_. Down with the privileges of the bureaucracy! Down
with Stakhanovism! Down with the Soviet aristocracy and its ranks and
orders! Greater equality of wages for all forms of labor!

The struggle for the freedom of the trade unions and the factory
committees, for the right of assembly and freedom of the press, will
unfold in the struggle for the regeneration and development of _Soviet
democracy_.

The bureaucracy replaced the soviets as class organs with the fiction of
universal electoral rights – in the style of Hitler-Goebbels. It is
necessary to return to the soviets not only their free democratic form
but also their class content. As once the bourgeoisie and kulaks were
not permitted to enter the soviets, so now _it is necessary to drive the
bureaucracy and the new aristocracy out of the soviets_. In the soviets
there is room only for representatives of the workers, rank-and-file
collective farmers peasants and Red Army men.

Democratization of the soviets is impossible without legalization of
_soviet parties_. The workers and peasants themselves by their own free
vote will indicate what parties they recognize as soviet parties.

A revision of _planned economy_ from top to bottom in the interests of
producers and consumers! Factory committees should be returned the right
to control production. A democratically organized consumers’ cooperative
should control the quality and price of products.

Reorganization of the _collective farms_ in accordance with the will and
in the interests of the workers there engaged!

The reactionary _international policy_ of the bureaucracy should be
replaced by the policy of proletarian internationalism. The complete
diplomatic correspondence of the Kremlin to be published. _Down with
secret diplomacy!_

All political trials, staged by the Thermidorian bureaucracy, to be
reviewed in the light of complete publicity and controversial openness
and integrity. Only the victorious revolutionary uprising of the
oppressed masses can revive the Soviet regime and guarantee its further
development toward socialism. There is but one party capable of leading
the Soviet masses to insurrection – the party of the Fourth
International!

_Down with the bureaucratic gang of Cain-Stalin! Long live Soviet democracy! Long live the international socialist revolution!_


Against Opportunism and Unprincipled Revisionism

The politics of Leon Blum’s party in France demonstrate anew that
reformists are incapable of learning anything from even the most tragic
lessons of history. French Social Democracy slavishly copies the
politics of German Social Democracy and goes to meet the same end.
Within a few decades the Second International intertwined itself with
the bourgeois democratic regime, became, in fact, a part of it, and is
rotting away together with it.

The Third International has taken to the road of reformism at a time
when the crisis of capitalism definitely placed the proletarian
revolution on the order of the day. The Comintern’s policy in Spain and
China today – the policy of cringing before the “democratic” and
“national” bourgeoisie – demonstrates that the Comintern is likewise
incapable of learning anything further or of changing. The bureaucracy
which became a reactionary force in the USSR cannot play a revolutionary
role on the world arena.

Anarcho-syndicalism in general has passed through the same kind of
evolution. In France the syndicalist bureaucracy of Leon Jouhaux has
long since become a bourgeois agency in the working class. In Spain,
anarcho-syndicalism shook off its ostensible revolutionism and became
the fifth wheel in the chariot of bourgeois democracy.

Intermediate centrist organizations centered about the London Bureau
represent merely “left” appendages of Social Democracy or of the
Comintern. They have displayed a complete inability to make head or tail
of the political situation and draw revolutionary conclusions from it.
Their highest point was the Spanish POUM, which under revolutionary
conditions proved completely incapable of following a revolutionary
line.

The tragic defeats suffered by the world proletariat over a long period
of years doomed the official organizations to yet greater conservatism
and simultaneously sent disillusioned petty bourgeois “revolutionists”
in pursuit of “new ways.” As always during epochs of reaction and decay,
quacks and charlatans appear on all sides, desirous of revising the
whole course of revolutionary thought. Instead of learning from the
past, they “reject” it. Some discover the inconsistency of Marxism,
others announce the downfall of Bolshevism. There are those who put
responsibility upon revolutionary doctrine for the mistakes and crimes
of those who betrayed it; others who curse the medicine because it does
not guarantee an instantaneous and miraculous cure. The more daring
promise to discover a panacea and, in anticipation, recommend the
halting of the class struggle. A good many prophets of “new morals” are
preparing to regenerate the labor movement with the help of ethical
homeopathy. The majority of these apostles have succeeded in becoming
themselves moral invalids before arriving on the field of battle. Thus,
under the aspect of “new ways,” old recipes, long since buried in the
archives of pre-Marxian socialism, are offered to the proletariat.

The Fourth International declares uncompromising war on the
bureaucracies of the Second, Third, Amsterdam and Anarcho-syndicalist
Internationals, as on their centrist satellites; on reformism without
reforms; democracy in alliance with the GPU; pacifism without peace;
anarchism in the service of the bourgeoisie; on “revolutionists” who
live in deathly fear of revolution. All of these organizations are not
pledges for the future, but decayed survivals of the past. The epoch of
wars and revolutions will raze them to the ground.

The Fourth International does not search after and does not invent
panaceas. It takes its stand completely on Marxism as the only
revolutionary doctrine that enables one to understand reality, unearth
the cause behind the defeats and consciously prepare for victory. The
Fourth International continues the tradition of Bolshevism which first
showed the proletariat how to conquer power. The Fourth International
sweeps away the quacks, charlatans and unsolicited teachers of morals.
In a society based upon exploitation, the highest moral is that of the
social revolution. All methods are good which raise the class
consciousness of the workers, their trust in their own forces, their
readiness for self-sacrifice in the struggle. The impermissible methods
are those which implant fear and submissiveness in the oppressed before
their oppressors, which crush the spirit of protest and indignation or
substitute for the will of the masses – the will of the leaders; for
conviction – compulsion; for an analysis of reality – demagogy and
frame-up. That is why Social Democracy, prostituting Marxism, and
Stalinism – the antithesis of Bolshevism – are both mortal enemies of
the proletarian revolution and its morals.

To face reality squarely; not to seek the line of least resistance; to
call things by their right names; to speak the truth to the masses, no
matter how bitter it may be; not to fear obstacles; to be true in little
things as in big ones; to base one’s program on the logic of the class
struggle; to be bold when the hour for action arrives – these are the
rules of the Fourth International. It has shown that it could swim
against the stream. The approaching historical wave will raise it on its
crest.


Against Sectarianism

Under the influence of the betrayal by the historical organizations of
the proletariat, certain sectarian moods and groupings of various kinds
arise or are regenerated at the periphery of the Fourth International.
At their base lies a refusal to struggle for partial and transitional
demands, i.e., for the elementary interests and needs of the working
masses, as they are today. Preparing for the revolution means to the
sectarians, convincing themselves of the superiority of socialism. They
propose turning their backs on the “old” trade unions, i.e., to tens of
millions of organized workers – as if the masses could somehow live
outside of the conditions of the actual class struggle!

They remain indifferent to the inner struggle within reformist
organizations – as if one could win the masses without intervening in
their daily strife! They refuse to draw a distinction between the
bourgeois democracy and fascism – as if the masses could help but feel
the difference on every hand!

Sectarians are capable of differentiating between but two colors: red
and black. So as not to tempt themselves, they simplify reality. They
refuse to draw a distinction between the fighting camps in Spain for the
reason that both camps have a bourgeois character. For the same reason
they consider it necessary to preserve “neutrality” in the war between
Japan and China. They deny the principled difference between the USSR
and the imperialist countries, and because of the reactionary policies
of the Soviet bureaucracy they reject defense of the new forms of
property, created by the October Revolution, against the onslaughts of
imperialism. Incapable of finding access to the masses, they therefore
zealously accuse the masses of inability to raise themselves to
revolutionary ideas.

These sterile politicians generally have no need of a bridge in the form
of transitional demands because they do not intend to cross over to the
other shore. They simply dawdle in one place, satisfying themselves with
a repetition of the same meager abstractions. Political events are for
them an occasion for comment but not for action. Since sectarians as in
genera every kind of blunderer and miracle-man, are toppled by reality
at each step, they live in a state of perpetual exasperation,
complaining about the “regime” and the “methods” and ceaselessly
wallowing in small intrigues. In their own circles they customarily
carry on a regime of despotism. The political prostration of
sectarianism serves to complement, shadow-like, the prostration of
opportunism, revealing no revolutionary vistas. In practical politics,
sectarians unite with opportunists, particularly with centrists, every
time in the struggle against Marxism.

Most of the sectarian groups and cliques, nourished on accidental crumbs
from the table of the Fourth International lead an “independent”
organizational existence, with great pretensions but without the least
chance for success. Bolshevik-Leninists, without waste of time, calmly
leave these groups to their own fate. However, sectarian tendencies are
to be found also in our own ranks and display a ruinous influence on the
work of the individual sections. It is impossible to make any further
compromise with them even for a single day. A correct policy regarding
trade unions is a basic condition for adherence to the Fourth
International. He who does not seek and does not find the road to the
masses is not a fighter but a dead weight to the party. A program is
formulated not for the editorial board or for the leaders of discussion
clubs, but for the revolutionary action of millions. The cleansing of
the ranks of the Fourth International of sectarianism and incurable
sectarians is a primary condition for revolutionary success.


Open the Road to the Woman Worker! Open the Road to the Youth!

The defeat of the Spanish Revolution engineered by its “leaders,” the
shameful bankruptcy of the People’s Front in France, and the exposure of
the Moscow juridical swindles – these three facts in their aggregate
deal an irreparable blow to the Comintern and, incidentally, grave
wounds to its allies: the Social Democrats and Anarcho-syndicalists.
This does not mean, of course, that the members of these organizations
will immediately turn to the Fourth International. The older generation,
having suffered terrible defeats, will leave the movement in significant
numbers. In addition, the Fourth International is certainly not striving
to become an asylum for revolutionary invalids, disillusioned
bureaucrats and careerists. On the contrary, against a possible influx
into our party of petty bourgeois elements, now reigning in the
apparatus of the old organizations, strict preventive measures are
necessary: a prolonged probationary period for those candidates who are
not workers, especially former party bureaucrats: prevention from
holding any responsible post for the first three years, etc. There is
not and there will not be any place for careerism, the ulcer of the old
internationals, in the Fourth International. Only those who wish to live
for the movement, and not at the expense of the movement, will find
access to us. The revolutionary workers should feel themselves to be the
masters. The doors of our organization are wide open to them.

Of course, even among the workers who had at one time risen to the first
ranks, there are not a few tired and disillusioned ones. They will
remain, at least for the next period as bystanders. When a program or an
organization wears out the generation which carried it on its shoulders
wears out with it. The movement is revitalized by the youth who are free
of responsibility for the past. The Fourth International pays particular
attention to the young generation of the proletariat. All of its
policies strive to inspire the youth with belief in its own strength and
in the future. Only the fresh enthusiasm and aggressive spirit of the
youth can guarantee the preliminary successes in the struggle; only
these successes can return the best elements of the older generation to
the road of revolution. Thus it was thus it will be.

Opportunist organizations by their very nature concentrate their chief
attention on the top layers of the working class and therefore ignore
both the youth and the women workers. The decay of capitalism, however,
deals its heaviest blows to the woman as a wage earner and as a
housewife. The sections of the Fourth International should seek bases of
support among the most exploited layers of the working class;
consequently, among the women workers. Here they will find inexhaustible
stores of devotion, selflessness and readiness to sacrifice.

_Down with the bureaucracy and careerism! Open the road to the youth! Turn to the woman worker!_

These slogans are emblazoned on the banner of the Fourth International.


Under the Banner of the Fourth International!

Skeptics ask: But has the moment for the creation of the Fourth
International yet arrived? It is impossible, they say, to create an
International “artificially”; it can arise only out of great events,
etc., etc. All of these objections merely show that skeptics are no good
for the building of a new International. They are good for scarcely
anything at all.

The Fourth International has already arisen out of great events: the
greatest defeats of the proletariat in history. The cause for these
defeats is to be found in the degeneration and perfidy of the old
leadership. The class struggle does not tolerate an interruption. The
Third International, following the Second, is dead for purposes of
revolution. Long live the Fourth International!

But has the time yet arrived to proclaim its creation? ... the skeptics
are not quieted down. The Fourth International, we answer, has no need
of being “proclaimed.” It exists and it fights. It is weak? Yes, its
ranks are not numerous because it is still young. They are as yet
chiefly cadres. But these cadres are pledges for the future. Outside
these cadres there does not exist a single revolutionary current on this
planet really meriting the name. If our international be still weak in
numbers, it is strong in doctrine, program, tradition, in the
incomparable tempering of its cadres. Who does not perceive this today,
let him in the meantime stand aside. Tomorrow it will become more
evident.

The Fourth International, already today, is deservedly hated by the
Stalinists, Social Democrats, bourgeois liberals and fascists. There is
not and there cannot be a place for it in any of the People’s Fronts. It
uncompromisingly gives battle to all political groupings tied to the
apron-strings of the bourgeoisie. Its task – the abolition of
capitalism’s domination. Its aim – socialism. Its method – the
proletarian revolution.

Without inner democracy – no revolutionary education. Without discipline
– no revolutionary action. The inner structure of the Fourth
International is based on the principles of _democratic centralism_:
full freedom in discussion, complete unity in action.

The present crisis in human culture is the crisis in the proletarian
leadership. The advanced workers, united in the Fourth International,
show their class the way out of the crisis. They offer a program based
on international experience in the struggle of the proletariat and of
all the oppressed of the world for liberation. They offer a spotless
banner.

Workers – men and women – of all countries, place yourselves under the
banner of the Fourth International. It is the banner of your approaching
victory!

------------------------------------------------------------------------


Discussions with Trotsky On the Transitional Program

(June 1938)

Discussed: June 7, 1938
Source: _FOURTH INTERNATIONAL_ [New York], Vol.7 No.2 (Whole No.63),
February 1946, pp.53-59.
Transcription/HTML Markup: David Walters.
Copyleft: Leon Trotsky Internet Archive (www.marxists.org) 2002.
Permission is granted to copy and/or distribute this document under the
terms of the GNU Free Documentation License.

TROTSKY: The significance of the program is the significance of the
party. The party is the vanguard of the class. The party is formed by
selection from the most conscious, most advanced, most devoted elements
and the party can play an important historical political role not in
direct relation to its numerical strength. It can be a small party and
play a great part. For example, in the first Russian Revolution of 1905,
the Bolshevik fraction had not more than 10,000 members, the Mensheviks
10,000 to 12,000; that is the maximum. At that time they belonged to the
same party, so that the party as a whole had not more than 20,000 to
22,000 workers. The party guided the Soviets throughout the whole
country thanks to correct policy and to cohesion. It can be objected
that the difference between the Russians and the Americans, or any other
old capitalist country, was that the Russian proletariat was a totally
fresh, virgin proletariat without any tradition of trade unions,
conservative reformism. It was a young fresh virgin working class which
needed direction and looked for this direction and in spite of the fact
that the party as a whole had not more than 20,000 workers this party
guided 23,000,000 workers in the fight.

Now, what is the party? In what does the cohesion consist? This cohesion
is a common understanding of the events, of the tasks, and this common
understanding - that is the program of the party. Just as modern workers
more than the barbarian cannot work without tools so in the party the
program is the instrument. Without the program every worker must
improvise his tool, find improvised tools, and one contradicts another.

Only when we have the vanguard organized upon the basis of common
conceptions then we can act.

One can say that we didn’t have a program until this day. Yet we acted.
But this program was formulated under different articles, different
motions, etc. In this sense the draft program doesn’t presage a new
invention, it is not the writing of one man. It is the summation of
collective work up until today. But such a summation is absolutely
necessary in order to give to the comrades an idea of the situation, a
common understanding. Petty bourgeois anarchists and intellectuals are
afraid to subscribe to giving a party common ideas, a common attitude.
In opposition they wish moral programs. But for us this program is the
result of common experience. It is not imposed upon anybody for whoever
joins the party does so voluntarily.

I believe it is important in this connection to underline what we mean
by freedom in contradiction to necessity. It is very often a petty
bourgeois conception that we should have a free individuality. It is
only a fiction, an error. We are not free. We have no free will in the
sense of metaphysical philosophy. When I wish to drink a glass of beer I
act as a free man but I don’t invent the need for beer. That comes from
my body. I am only the executor. But insofar as I understand the needs
of my body and can satisfy them consciously then I have the sensation of
freedom, freedom through understanding the necessity. Here the correct
understanding of the necessity of my body is the only real freedom given
to animals in any question and man is an animal. The same holds true for
the class. The program for the class cannot fall from heaven. We can
arrive only at an understanding of the necessity. In one case it was my
body in the other it is the necessity of society. The program is the
articulation of the necessity, that we learned to understand, and since
the necessity is the same for all members of the class, we can reach a
common understanding of the tasks and the understanding of this
necessity is the program.

We can go further and say that the discipline of our party must be very
severe because we are a revolutionary party against a tremendous bloc of
enemies conscious of their interests and now we are attacked not only by
the bourgeoisie but by the Stalinists, the most venomous of the
bourgeois agents. Absolute discipline is necessary but it must come from
common understanding. If it is imposed from without it is a yoke. If it
comes from understanding it is an expression of personality, but
otherwise it is a yoke. Then discipline is an expression of my free
individuality. It is not opposition between personal will and the party
because I entered of my free will. The program too is on this basis and
this program can be upon a sure political and moral basis only if we
understand it very well.

 

Why Draft Program Is Not Complete

The draft program is not a complete program. We can say that in this
draft program there are things which are lacking and there are things
which by their nature don’t belong to the program. Things which don’t
belong to the program are the comments. This program contains not only
slogans but also comments and polemics against the adversaries. But it
is not a complete program. A complete program should have a theoretical
expression of the modern capitalist society in its imperialist stage.
The reasons of the crisis, the growth of unemployed, and so on and in
this draft this analysis is briefly summarized only in the first chapter
because we have written about these things in articles, books, and so
on. We will write more and better. But for practical purposes what is
said here is enough because we are all of the same opinion. The
beginning of the program is not complete. The first chapter is only a
hint and not a complete expression. Also the end of the program is not
complete because we don’t speak here about the social revolution, about
the seizure of power by insurrection, the transformation of capitalist
society into the dictatorship, the dictatorship into the socialist
society. This brings the reader only to the doorstep. It is a program
for action from today until the beginning of the socialist revolution.
And from the practical point of view what is now the most important is
how can we guide the different strata of the proletariat in the
direction of the social revolution. I have heard that now the New York
comrades are beginning to organize circles with the purpose of not only
studying and criticizing the draft program but also elaborating the ways
and means in order to present the program to the masses and I believe
that it is the best method which our party can utilize.

The program is only the first approximation. It is too general in the
sense in which it is presented to the international conference in the
next period. It expresses the general tendency of development in the
whole world. We have here a short chapter devoted to the semi-colonial
and colonial countries. We have here a chapter devoted to the fascist
countries, a chapter on the Soviet Union and so on. It is clear that the
general characteristics of the world situation are common because they
are all under the pressure of the imperialist economy, but every country
has its peculiar conditions and real live politics must begin with these
peculiar conditions in each country and even in each part of the
country. That is why a very serious approach to the program is the first
duty of every comrade in the United States.

There are two dangers in the elaboration of the program. The first is to
remain on general abstract lines and to repeat the general slogan
without real connection with the trade unions in the locality. That is
the direction of sectarian abstraction. The other danger is the
contrary, to adapt too much to the local conditions, to the specific
conditions, to lose the general revolutionary line. I believe that in
the United States the second danger is the more immediate. I remember it
most especially in the matter of militarization, armed pickets, etc.
Some comrades were afraid that it is not real for the workers, etc.

In the last few days I read a French book written by an Italian worker
about the rise of Fascism in Italy. The writer is opportunistic. He was
a Socialist, but it is not his conclusions which are interesting but the
facts which he presents. He gives the picture of the Italian proletariat
in 1920-1921 especially. It was a powerful organization. They had 160
socialist parliamentary deputies. They had more than one-third of the
communities in their hands, the most important sections of Italy were in
the hands of the socialists, the center of the power of the workers. No
capitalist could hire or fire without union consent and this applied to
agricultural workers as well as industrial. It seemed to be 49 percent
of the dictatorship of the proletariat, but the reaction of the small
bourgeoisie, the demobilized officers was terrible against this
situation. Then the author tells how they organized small bands under
the guidance of officers and sent them in buses in every direction. In
cities of 10,000 in the hands of the Socialists thirty organized men
came into the town, burned up the municipality, burned the houses, shot
the leaders, imposed on them the conditions of working for capitalists,
then they went elsewhere and repeated the same in hundreds and hundreds
of towns, one after the other. With terrible terror and these systematic
acts the totally destroyed the trade unions and thus became bosses of
Italy. They were a tiny minority.

 

Methods of the Fascists

The workers declared a general strike. The Fascists sent their buses and
destroyed every local strike and with a small organized minority wiped
out the workers’ organizations. After this came elections and the
workers under the terror elected the same number of deputies. They
protested in parliament until it was dissolved. That is the difference
between formal and actual power. All the deputies were sure that they
would have power, yet this tremendous movement with its spirit of
sacrifice was smashed, crushed, abolished by some 10,000 fascists
well-organized with a spirit of sacrifice and good military leaders.

In the United States it might be different but the fundamental tasks are
the same. I read about the tactics of Hague [The Major of Jersey City,
New Jersey, in the United States, who functioned, more or less, as a
Fascist]. It is a rehearsal of a Fascist overthrow. He represents small
bosses who became infuriated because the crisis deepened. He has his
gang which is absolutely unconstitutional. This is very, very
contagious. With the deepening of the crisis it will spread all over the
country and Roosevelt who is a very good democrat will say, “Perhaps it
is the only solution.”

It was the same in Italy. They had a minister who invited the
Socialists. The Socialists refused. He admitted the Fascists. He thought
he could balance them against the Socialists, but they smashed the
minister too. Now I think the example of New Jersey is very important.
We should utilize everything, but this especially. I will propose a
special series of articles on how the Fascists became victorious. We can
become victorious the same way but we must have a small armed body with
the support of the big body of workers. We must have the best
discipline, organized workers, defense committees, otherwise we will be
crushed and I believe that our comrades in the United States don’t
realize the importance of this question. A Fascist wave can spread in
two or three years and the best workers’ leaders will he lynched in the
worst possible way like the Negroes in the South. I believe that the
terror in the United States will be the most terrible of all. That is
why we must begin very modestly that is with defense groups but it
should be launched immediately.

_QUESTION: How do we go about launching the defense groups practically?_

TROTSKY: It is very simple. Do you have a picket line in a strike? When
the strike is over we say we must defend our union by making this picket
line permanent.

_QUESTION: Does the party itself create the defense group with its own
members?_

TROTSKY: The slogans of the party must be placed in quarters where we
have sympathizers and workers who will defend us. But a party cannot
create an independent defense organization. The task is to create such a
body in the trade unions. We must have these groups of comrades with
very good discipline, with good cautious leaders not easily provoked
because such groups can be provoked easily. The main task for the next
year would be to avoid conflicts and bloody clashes. We must reduce them
to a minimum with a minority organization during strikes, during
peaceful times. In order to prevent fascist meetings it is a question of
the relationship of forces. We alone are not strong, but we propose a
united front.

Hitler explains his success in his book. The Social Democracy was
extremely powerful. To a meeting of the Social Democracy he sent a band
with Rudolf Hess. He says that at the end of the meeting his thirty boys
evicted all the workers and they were incapable of opposing them. Then
he knew he would be victorious. The workers were only organized to pay
dues. No preparation at all for other tasks. Now we must do what Hitler
did except in reverse. Send 40 to 50 men to dissolve the meeting. This
has tremendous importance. The workers become steeled, fighting
elements. They become trumpets. The petty bourgeoisie think these are
serious people. Such a success! This has tremendous importance as so
much of the populace is blind, backward, oppressed, they can be aroused
only by success. We can only arouse the vanguard but this vanguard must
then arouse the others. That is why I repeat it is a very important
question. In Minneapolis where we have very skilled powerful comrades we
can begin and show the entire country.

I believe that it would be useful to discuss a little this part of the
draft which is not sufficiently developed in our text. It is the general
theoretical part. In the last discussion I remarked that the theoretical
part of the program as a general analysis of society is not given
completely in this draft but is replaced by some short hints. On the
other side it does not contain the parts dealing with the revolution,
the dictatorship of the proletariat, and the construction of society
after the revolution: Only the transition period is covered. We have
repeated many times that the scientific character of our activity
consists in the fact that we adapt our program not to political
conjunctures or the thought or mood of the masses as this mood is today,
but we adapt our program to the objective situation as it is represented
by the economic class structure of society. The mentality can be
backward; then the political task of the party is to bring the mentality
into harmony with the objective facts, to make the workers understand
the objective task. But we cannot adapt the program to the backward
mentality of the workers, the mentality, the mood is a secondary factor
– the prime factor is the objective situation. That is why we have heard
these criticisms or these appreciations that some parts of the program
do not conform to the situation.

 

Our Program Must Fit Objective Situation

Everywhere I ask what should we do? Make our program fit the objective
situation or the mentality of the workers? And I believe that this
question must be put before every comrade who says that this program is
not fit for the American situation. This program is a scientific
program. It is based on an objective analysis of the objective
situation. It cannot be understood by the workers as a whole. It would
be very good if the vanguard would understand it in the next period and
that they would then turn and say to the workers, “You must cave
yourselves from fascism.”

What do we understand by objective situation? Here we must analyze the
objective conditions for a social revolution. These conditions are given
in the works of Marx-Engels and remain in their essence unchanged today.
First, Marx one time said that no one society leaves its place until it
totally exhausts its possibilities. What does this signify? That we
cannot eliminate a society by subjective will, that we cannot organize
an insurrection like the Blanquists. What do “possibilities” signify?
That a “society cannot leave?” So long as society is capable of
developing the productive forces and making the nation richer it remains
strong, stable. That was the condition with slave society, with feudal,
and with capitalist society. Here we come to a very interesting point
which I analyzed previously in my introduction to the Communist
_Manifesto._ Marx and Engels waited for a revolution during their
lifetime. Especially in the years 1848-1850 did they expect a social
revolution. Why? They said that the capitalist system based on private
profit had become a brake upon the development of the productive forces.
Was this correct? Yes and no. It was correct in the sense that if the
workers had been capable of meeting the needs of the nineteenth century
and seizing power, the development of the productive forces would have
been more rapid and the nation richer. But given that the workers were
not capable, the capitalist system remained with its crisis, etc. Yet
the general line ascended. The last war (1914-1918) was a result of the
fact that the world market became too narrow for the development of the
productive forces and each nation tried to repulse all the others and to
seize the world market for its own purposes. They could not succeed and
now we see that capitalist society enters into a new stage. Many say it
was a result of the war, but the war was a result of the fact that the
society exhausted its possibilities. The war was only an expression of
its inability to further expand. We have after the war the historic
crisis becoming deeper and deeper. Capitalist development everywhere was
prosperity and crisis but the summation of the crises and prosperity was
an ascendancy. Beginning with the war we see the cycles of crisis and
prosperity forming a declining line. It signifies now that this society
exhausted totally its inner possibilities and must be replaced by a new
society or the old society will go into barbarism just as the
civilization of Greece and Rome because they had exhausted their
possibilities and no class could replace them.

 

Three Requisites for New Society

That is the question now and especially in the United States. The first
requisite now for a new society is that the productive forces must be
sufficiently developed in order to give birth to a higher. Are the
productive forces sufficiently developed for this? Yes, they were
developed sufficiently in the nineteenth century – not as well as now
but sufficiently. Now especially in the United States it would be very
easy for a good statistician to prove that if the American productive
forces were unleased that even now today they could be doubled or
tripled. I believe that our comrades should make such statistical
survey.

The second condition – there must be a new progressive class which is
sufficiently numerous and economically influential in order to impose
its will upon society. This class is the proletariat. It must be the
majority of the nation or must have the possibility to lead the
majority. In England the working class is the absolute majority. In
Russia it was a minority but it had the possibility to lead the poor
peasants. In the United States it is at least half of the population but
it has the possibility to lead the farmers.

The third condition is the subjective factor. This class must understand
its position in society and have its own organizations. That is the
condition which is now lacking from the historic point of view. Socially
it is not only possible but an absolute necessity in the sense that it
is either socialism or barbarism. That is the historical alternative.

We mentioned in the discussion that Mr. Hague is not some stupid old man
who imagines some medieval system exists in his town. He is an advance
scout of the American capitalist class.

Jack London wrote a book, THE IRON HEEL. I recommend it now. It was
written in 1907. At that time it seemed a terrible dream but now it is
absolute reality. He gives the development of the class struggle in the
United States with the capitalist class retaining power through terrible
repressions. It is the picture of Fascism. The ideology he gives even
corresponds with Hitler. It is very interesting.

In Newark, the Mayor begins to imitate Hague and they are all inspired
by Hague and by the big bosses. It is absolutely certain that Roosevelt
will observe that now in the crisis he can do nothing with democratic
means. He is not a fascist as the Stalinists claimed in 1932. But his
initiative will be paralyzed. What can he do? The workers are
dissatisfied. The big bosses are dissatisfied. He can only maneuver
until the end of his term and then say goodbye. A third term for
Roosevelt is absolutely excluded.

The imitation of the Newark mayor has tremendous importance. In two or
three years you can have a powerful fascist movement of American
character. What is Hague? He has nothing to do with Mussolini or Hitler,
but he is an American fascist. Why is he aroused? Because the society
can no longer be run by democratic means.

It would of course be impermissible to fall into hysteria.

The danger of the working class being out-run by events is indisputable,
but we can combat this danger only by energetic systematic development
of our own activity under adequate revolutionary slogans and not by
fantastic efforts to spring over our own heads.

Democracy is only the rule of big bosses. We must understand well what
Lundberg showed in his book, that 60 families govern the United States.
But how? By democratic means up until today. They are a small minority
surrounded by middle classes, the petty bourgeoisie, workers. They must
have the possibility of interesting the middle classes in this society.
They must not be desperate. The same holds true for the worker. At least
for the higher strata. If they are opposed they can break the
revolutionary possibilities of the lower strata and this is the only way
of working democracy.

 

“Democratic” Regime Possible Only for Rich Nations

The democratic regime is the most aristocratic way of ruling.

It is possible only to a rich nation. Every British democrat has 9 or 10
slaves working in the colonies. The antique Greek society was a slave
democracy. The same in a certain sense can be said of British democracy,
Holland, France, Belgium. The United States has no direct colonies but
they have Latin America and the whole world is a sort of colony for the
United States, not to speak about appropriating the richest continent
and developing without a feudal tradition. It is a historically
privileged nation but the privileged capitalist nations differ from the
most “pariah” capitalist nations only from the point of view of delay.
Italy, the poorest of the great capitalist nations first became fascist.
Germany became second because Germany has no colonies or rich subsidiary
countries and on this poor base exhausted all the possibilities and the
workers could not replace the bourgeoisie. Now it is the turn of the
United States even before Great Britain or France. The duty of our party
is to seize every American worker and shake him ten times so he will
understand what the situation is in the United States. That it is not a
conjunctural crisis but a social crisis. Our party can play a very great
role. What is difficult for a young party in a very thick atmosphere of
previous traditions, hypocrisy, is to launch a revolutionary slogan. “It
is fantastic,” “not adequate in America,” but it is possible that this
will change by the time you launch the revolutionary slogans of our
program. Somebody will laugh. But revolutionary courage is not only to
be shot but to support the laughter of stupid people who are in the
majority. But when one of them is beaten by Hague’s gang he will think
it is good to have a defense committee and his ironic attitude will
change.

_QUESTION: Isn’t the ideology of the workers a part of the objective
factors?_

TROTSKY: For us as a small minority this whole thing is objective
including the mood of the workers. But we must analyze and classify
those elements of the objective situation which can be changed by our
paper and those which cannot be changed. That is why we say that the
program is adapted to the fundamental stable elements of the objective
situation and the task is to adapt the mentality of the masses to those
objective factors. To adapt the mentality is a pedagogical task. We must
be patient, etc. The crisis of society is given as the base of our
activity. The mentality is the political arena of our activity. We must
change it. We must give a scientific explanation of society, and clearly
explain it to the masses. That is the difference between Marxism and
reformism.

The reformists have a good smell for what the audience wants as Norman
Thomas – he gives them that. But that is not serious revolutionary
activity. We must have the courage to be unpopular, to say “you are
fools,” “you are stupid,” “they betray you,” and every once in a while
with a scandal launch our ideas with passion. It is necessary to shake
the worker from time to time, to explain, and then shake him again –
that all belongs to the art of propaganda. But it must be scientific,
not bent to the moods of the masses. We are the most realistic people
because we reckon with facts which cannot be changed by the eloquence of
Norman Thomas. If we win immediate success we swim with the current of
the masses and that current is the revolution.

_QUESTION: Sometimes I think that our own leaders don’t feel these
problems._

TROTSKY: Possibly it is two things. One is to understand, the other feel
it with muscles, fibers. It is necessary now to be penetrated by this
understanding that we must change our politics. It is a question not
only for the masses, but for the party. It is a question not only for
the party but also for the leaders. We had some discussions, some
differences. It is impossible to come to the position at the same time.
There are always frictions. They are inevitable and even necessary. It
was the reason for this program, to provoke this discussion.

_QUESTION: How much time should we allow for this discussion among the
leaders?_

TROTSKY: It is very difficult to say. It will depend on many factors. We
cannot allow too of a great deal of time. We must now accomplish this
new orientation. It is new and old. It is based on all past activity but
now it opens a new chapter. In spite of errors, frictions, and fights,
now a new chapter opens and we must mobilize all our forces upon it in
more energetic attitude. What is important, when the program is
definitely established, is to know the slogans very well and to maneuver
them skillfully so that in every part of the country everyone uses the
same slogans at the same time. 3,000 can make the impression of 15,000
or 50,000.

_QUESTION: Comrades may agree abstractly to this program but do we have
experienced comrades to carry out slogans in the masses? They agree
abstractly but what can I do with the backward workers in my union?_

TROTSKY: Our party is a party of the American working class. You must
remember – that a powerful proletarian movement not to speak of a
powerful proletarian revolution has not occurred in the United States.
In 1917 we didn’t have the possibility to win without 1905. My
generation was very young. During 12 years we had a very good chance to
understand our defeats and correct them and to win. But even then we
lost again to the new bureaucrats. That is why we cannot see whether our
party will directly lead the American working class to victory. It is
possible that the American workers, who are patriotic, whose standard of
living is high will have rebellions, strikes. On one side Hague, the
other Lewis. That can last for a long period, years and years, and
during this time our people will steel themselves, become more sure of
themselves, and the workers will say, “They are the only people capable
of seeing the path.” Only war produces war heroes. For the beginning we
have excellent elements, very good men, seriously educated, a good
staff, and not a small staff. In this more general sense I am totally
optimistic. Then I believe that the change in the mentality of the
American workers will come at a very speedy rhythm. What to do?
Everybody is disquieted, looking for something new. It is very favorable
for revolutionary propaganda.

We must remember not only the aristocratic elements but the poorest
elements. The cultivated American workers have a plus and a minus such
as English sports. It is very good but also a device to demoralize the
workers. All the revolutionary energy was expended in sports. It was
cultivated by the British, the most intelligent of the capitalist
nations. Sports should be in the hands of the trade unions as a part of
the revolutionary education. But you have a good part of the youth and
women who are not rich enough for these things. We must have tentacles
to penetrate everywhere into the deepest strata.

_QUESTION: I think the party has made a great advance since the last
convention._

TROTSKY: A very important turn has been accomplished. Now it is
necessary to give this weapon a concentrated action. General dispersed
agitation doesn’t penetrate into the minds of the uneducated. But if you
repeat the same slogans, adapting them to the situation, then repetition
which is the mother of teaching will act likewise in politics. Very
often it happens not only with the intellectual but with a worker that
he believes that everybody understands what he has learned. It is
necessary to repeat with insistence, to repeat every day and everywhere.
That is the task of the draft program – to issue a homogeneous
impression.
